Polymerase chain reaction in rapid diagnosis of neonatal sepsis.In a prospective study a total of hundred neonates who fulfilled the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology's (ACOG) criteria for probable sepsis admitted to NICU of tertiary care armed forces hospital were investigated for evidence of sepsis. The investigation protocol included sepsis screen, blood culture and 1 mL of venous blood for molecular analysis by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for bacterial DNA component encoding 16 s RNA in all cases. 100 newborns with probable sepsis were studied to evaluate the molecular diagnosis of sepsis using PCR amplification of 16 S RNA in newborns with risk factors for sepsis or those who have clinical evidence of sepsis. We compared the results of PCR with blood culture and other markers of sepsis screen (total leucocyte count (TLC), absolute neutrophil count (ANC), immature/total neutrophil count ratio (I/T ratio), peripheral blood smear, micro ESR and C reactive protein (CRP). Controls consisted of 30 normal healthy newborns with no overt evidence of sepsis. Sepsis screen was positive in 24 (24%) of cases in study group with sensitivity and specificity of 100% and 83.5% respectively. Blood culture was positive in 09(9%t) with sensitivity of 69.2% and specificity of 100%. PCR was positive in 13(13%) of cases (9% are both blood culture and sepsis screen positive and 4% are positive by sepsis screen); the sensitivity of PCR was 100% and specificity was 95.6%. Blood culture is the most reliable method for diagnosis of neonatal sepsis. Polymerase chain reaction is useful and superior to blood culture for early diagnosis of sepsis in neonates.The use of molecular techniques for bacterial detection in the analysis of gastric aspirates collected from infants on the first day of life.Prospective service evaluation of the utility of molecular methods to analyse neonatal gastric aspirate specimens in a single neonatal unit and associated maternity unit. 43 newborn infants investigated for sepsis with median gestational age of 39 weeks (range 31-41 weeks) and median birth weight 3050 grams (range 1250-4220 g). Gastric aspirates routinely collected within 12h of birth were analysed using conventional and molecular methods for bacterial detection, bacterial DNA load and sequencing to identified bacterial species.Bacterial DNA loads varied from 0.03 to 1736 pg/microl of DNA extract (1 microl of DNA extract equivalent to 4 microl gastric aspirate). Bacteria were identified in 30/43 (70%) of samples by molecular methods and 10/43 (23.3%) of samples by culture. Cultures were only positive when the bacterial DNA exceeded 4.5 pg/microl of extract. Infants with prolonged rupture of membranes (>24h prior to delivery) had a DNA load on average 23 times higher than those without (95%CI 3.7 to 141; p=0.001). Additional bacteria detected by molecular methods included many species that are fastidious and potentially pathogenic including Leptotrichia spp., Serratia spp., Ureaplasma spp., Veillonella spp., Haemophilus influenzae and Group B Streptococcus. Due to a low rate of adverse outcomes it was not possible to correlate bacterial identifications or DNA load with infant outcome.Molecular methods can identify bacteria from a greater proportion of gastric aspirate specimens that conventional culture. Further work is required to establish whether this information can be used to improve infant outcomes.Efficacy of bacterial ribosomal RNA-targeted reverse transcription-quantitative PCR for detecting neonatal sepsis: a case control study.Neonatal sepsis is difficult to diagnose and pathogens cannot be detected from blood cultures in many cases. Development of a rapid and accurate method for detecting pathogens is thus essential. The main purpose of this study was to identify etiological agents in clinically diagnosed neonatal sepsis using bacterial ribosomal RNA-targeted reverse transcription-quantitative PCR (BrRNA-RT-qPCR) and to conduct comparisons with the results of conventional blood culture. Since BrRNA-RT-qPCR targets bacterial ribosomal RNA, detection rates using this approach may exceed those using conventional PCR.Subjects comprised 36 patients with 39 episodes of suspected neonatal sepsis who underwent BrRNA-RT-qPCR and conventional blood culture to diagnose sepsis. Blood samples were collected aseptically for BrRNA-RT-qPCR and blood culture at the time of initial sepsis evaluation by arterial puncture. BrRNA-RT-qPCR and blood culture were undertaken using identical blood samples, and BrRNA-RT-qPCR was performed using 12 primer sets.Positive rate was significantly higher for BrRNA-RT-qPCR (15/39, 38.5%) than for blood culture (6/39, 15.4%; p = 0.0039). BrRNA-RT-qPCR was able to identify all pathogens detected by blood culture. Furthermore, this method detected pathogens from neonates with clinical sepsis in whom pathogens was not detected by culture methods.This RT-PCR technique is useful for sensitive detection of pathogens causing neonatal sepsis, even in cases with negative results by blood culture.Urine Nested Polymerase Chain Reaction in Neonatal Septicemia.This cross-sectional study was done to evaluate diagnostic efficacy of urine nested polymerase chain reaction (PCR) using broad-range 16SrDNA PCR-based amplification, followed by restriction analysis and sequencing in neonatal septicemia. The study included 50 babies; 48% had vaginal delivery, 46% were preterm, 20% had a history of prolonged rupture of membranes and 56% were low birth weight (≤2500 g). Clinical presentations were lethargy (96%), respiratory distress (80%) and bleeding diathesis (16%). Absolute neutrophil count <1800/mm(3) was observed in 60%, and positive C-reactive protein in 46%. Thirty neonates had positive blood culture, and Klebsiella pneumoniae (22%) was the predominant organism. Nested urine PCR was positive in 38 (76%) and detected bacterial DNA in 8 neonates with negative blood cultures. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of nested PCR were 100, 60, 78.9, 100 and 84%, respectively, compared with blood culture. Nested PCR can detect most bacteria in single assay and identify unusual and unexpected causal agents. Approach to term neonates born after maternal intrapartum fever and unknown maternal group B Streptococcus status: value of serum C-reactive protein and 16S rRNA gene PCR amplification.Thirty-six term neonates born after maternal intrapartum fever, with premature rupture of membranes <18 hours and unknown maternal group B Streptococcus status had blood samples for complete blood count, C-reactive protein, culture, and 16S rRNA gene polymerase chain reaction amplification. Only 2 neonates were symptomatic and none had leukopenia, C-reactive protein >1.0 mg/dL, bacteremia, or positive polymerase chain reaction.Results and relevance of molecular detection of pathogens by SeptiFast--a retrospective analysis in 75 critically ill children.Sepsis is a common cause of death in children. Early detection of bloodstream pathogens is crucial for the appropriate antibio­tic treatment. Blood cultures (BC) are the gold standard test used for detection. Recently, additional molecular detection methods of microbial DNA by multiplex PCR (SeptiFast, SF) have become available.Our retrospective study was aimed to compare results of BC to those of SF regarding results and therapeutic relevance.We identified a total of 110 SF samples in 75 patients with suspected systemic infection by retrospective chart review. Each patient underwent SF and BC testing simultaneously.The initial analysis displayed no statistical significant difference in positive SF results compared to BC (p=0.19): in 26 of 110 samples (24%) microbial DNA was found. 19 BC (17%) showed microbial growth. 14 samples were positive in SF but negative in BC (13%). In patients who were pretreated with antibiotics (n=97) pathogens were identified in 24 samples by SF (25%) but only in 11 samples by BC (11%). Based on the clinical presentation and the spectrum of bacterial isolates 3 BC were considered contaminated. Considering this, SF yielded pathogens significantly more often than BC in the overall study population (p=0.04). SF results were available at least 31 h before BC results. Based on SF result antibiotic therapy was adjusted in 14 patients (13%).Molecular detection of pathogens by SF was faster and more frequently positive than BC. We have therefore demonstrated that SF might be superior to BC in testing for bloodstream pathogens. Prospective multicentric studies are required to determine whether this hypothesis can be maintained.Non-culture detection of Streptococcus agalactiae (Lancefield group B Streptococcus) in clinical samples by real-time PCR.A real-time PCR assay targeting the cylB gene was developed to detect Streptococcus agalactiae [Lancefield group B Streptococcus (GBS)] from clinical samples. A total of 110 blood culture-negative samples [75 cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) and 35 EDTA blood samples] from neonates with probable GBS sepsis or meningitis were analysed. Among these, 16 of the 75 CSF samples were positive [21.3%, 95% confidence interval (CI) 12.7-32.3%] and two of the 35 EDTA blood samples were positive (5.7%, 95% CI 0.7-19.2%). The proportion testing positive in the CSF samples was significantly higher than in the EDTA blood samples (P=0.05, Fisher's exact test). Overall, this real-time PCR assay was shown to be superior to culture methods for detection of GBS from CSF and EDTA blood samples.Use of pyrosequencing of 16S rRNA fragments to differentiate between bacteria responsible for neonatal sepsis.Infants admitted to neonatal intensive care units for suspicion of bacterial sepsis receive at least two broad-spectrum antibiotics for a minimum of 48 to 72 hours to cover both gram-positive and gram-negative organisms while awaiting blood culture results. On average, bacterial growth becomes detectable within 12 to 24 hours, with an additional 24 to 48 hours required for identification. We have previously described using a 16S rRNA PCR assay for screening neonatal blood for bacterial DNA. Combining PCR with DNA sequencing could prove a faster means of detecting bacteria than culture-based identification. If successful, antibiotic therapy could be appropriately tailored sooner, thus sparing infants the administration of unnecessary antibiotics. Our goal was to assess the potential of pyrosequencing to differentiate between bacteria commonly associated with neonatal sepsis. To begin, full-length sequencing of the 380-bp 16S rRNA amplicons from representative bacteria was conducted (ABI 3100) and several databases queried. These included Staphylococcus sp., Streptococcus sp., Listeria sp., and numerous gram-negative rods. The sequences from clinical isolates were identical to those present in the published databases for the same bacteria. As a result, an informative 15 bases within the 380-bp amplicon was targeted for pyrosequencing following enrichment culture and PCR amplification. A total of 643 bacterial isolates commonly associated with neonatal sepsis, and 15 PCR-positive, culture-positive neonatal whole blood samples were analyzed by pyrosequencing. Results of DNA sequencing and culture identification were compared. In summary, we were successful at using PCR and pyrosequencing together to accurately differentiate between highly diverse bacterial groups.Utility of pyrosequencing in identifying bacteria directly from positive blood culture bottles.Growth in liquid media is the gold standard for detecting microorganisms associated with bloodstream infections. The Gram stain provides the first clue as to the etiology of infection, with phenotypic identification completed 1 or 2 days later. Providing more detailed information than the Gram stain can impart, and in less time than subculturing, would allow the use of more directed empirical therapy and, thus, reduce the patient's exposure to unnecessary or ineffective antibiotics sooner. The study had two objectives, as follows: (i) to identify new targets to improve our ability to differentiate among certain enteric gram-negative rods or among certain Streptococcus species and (ii) to determine whether real-time PCR and pyrosequencing could as accurately identify organisms directly from positive blood culture bottles as culture-based methods. Two hundred and fifty-five consecutive positive blood culture bottles were included. The results showed a high level of agreement between the two approaches; of the 270 bacteria isolated from the 255 blood culture bottles, results for pyrosequencing and culture-based identifications were concordant for 264/270 (97.8%) bacteria with three failed sequences, and three sequences without match. Additionally, compared to the universal 16S rRNA gene target, the new 23S rRNA gene targets greatly improved our ability to differentiate among certain enteric gram-negative rods or among certain Streptococcus species. In conclusion, combining real-time PCR and pyrosequencing provided valuable information beyond that derived from the initial Gram stain and in less time than phenotypic culture-based identification. This strategy, if implemented, could result in a more directed empirical therapy in patients and would promote responsible antibiotic stewardship.Rapid diagnosis of bacterial sepsis with PCR amplification and microarray hybridization in 16S rRNA gene.In this study, blood culture and PCR-microarray analysis were used to examine 172 cases of suspected septicemia. Primers and oligonucleotide probes, based on the sequences of bacterial 16SrRNA gene, were arrayed by imprinting on microarray slides. Blood specimens collected from 172 cases of suspected septicemia were cultured and then tested separately by PCR for the bacterial 16S rRNA. Of the 172 clinical cases, 17 cases tested positive by PCR. The number of positives identified by PCR (9.88%) was significantly higher than the number of positives identified by the blood culture (4.65%). When blood culture was used as control, the sensitivity of PCR was 100%, the specificity was 97.85%, and the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.979. When the 17 PCR positive specimens were further analyzed by hybridization against the microarrays, five were found to be probe positive for E. coli, four were positive for S. epidermidis, four were positive for CoNS, and two were positive for Bacillus and Propionibacterium, respectively. In the eight specimens showing positive results by both PCR and blood culture, the species determined by microarray analysis corresponded with the result obtained from blood culture. Detection of the bacterial 16SrRNA genes in clinical specimens by PCR and microarray analysis can be used to accurately diagnose neonatal sepsis. This method has a higher sensitivity and specificity than blood culture and can provide a rapid way for the etiological diagnosis of neonatal septicemia.Diagnosis of neonatal sepsis using universal primer polymerase chain reaction before and after starting antibiotic drug therapy.To study universal primer 16S rRNA gene polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for diagnosis of blood culture-positive neonatal sepsis before and after starting antibiotic drug therapy.Prospective study of diagnostic tests.Level III neonatal intensive care unit. Patients Neonates with a fresh episode of clinically suspected sepsis were enrolled; those with major malformations, life expectancy less than 12 hours, or contaminated blood cultures were excluded.Before starting antibiotic drug therapy, PCR (0 hour), blood culture, and sepsis screening (complete blood cell counts, micro-erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and C-reactive protein level) were performed. The PCR was repeated 12, 24, and 48 hours after starting antibiotic drug therapy.The primary outcomes were the sensitivity and specificity of 0-hour PCR for diagnosing blood culture-positive sepsis, and the secondary outcome was the proportion of 0-hour PCR-positive patients who remained positive after antibiotic drug therapy.Of 306 patients evaluated, 242 were included (mean [SD] gestation, 32.2 [3.1] weeks; and mean [SD] birth weight, 1529.2 [597.2] g). Blood culture was positive in 52 patients and 0-hour PCR in 57. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of PCR were 96.2%, 96.3%, 87.7%, 98.8%, 26.1, and 0.04, respectively. Two patients were blood culture positive but 0-hour PCR negative, whereas 7 were 0-hour PCR positive but blood culture negative. Of the 0-hour PCR-positive patients, 7 remained positive at 12 hours and none at 24 and 48 hours after starting antibiotic drug therapy. In 0-hour PCR-positive patients, no predictors of positive 12-hour PCR were identified.Universal primer PCR can accurately diagnose neonatal sepsis before but not after antibiotic drugs are given.Detection of fungal DNA in lysis-centrifugation blood culture for the diagnosis of invasive candidiasis in neonatal patients.We report data concerning the detection of fungal DNA directly from lysis-centrifugation blood culture to assess its value in the detection of fungaemia in 86 of the 347 patients admitted to the neonatal intensive-care unit between January 2009 and December 2010. The sensitivity and specificity of the PCR were 87.5% and 98.5%, respectively, with a positive predictive value of 93.3% and a negative predictive value of 97.1%. Detection of fungal DNA directly from blood culture Isolator 1.5 microbial tubes, without prior cultivation, is a promising approach for the rapid detection of Candida spp. in neonates with suspected candidaemia.Detection of bacterial DNA by PCR and reverse hybridization in the 16S rRNA gene with particular reference to neonatal septicemia.The clinical diagnosis of sepsis is difficult, particularly in neonates. It is necessary to develop a rapid and reliable method for detecting bacteria in blood and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and reverse hybridization of the 16S rRNA gene would permit fast and sensitive determination of the presence of bacteria and differentiate gram-positive bacteria from gram-negative ones in clinical specimens.We developed a pair of primers according to the gene encoding 16SrRNA found in all bacteria. DNA fragments from different bacterial species and from clinical samples were detected with PCR, and with reverse hybridization using a universal bacterial probe, a gram-positive probe and a gram-negative probe.A 371 bp DNA fragment was amplified from 20 different bacterial species. No signal was observed when human DNA and viruses were used as templates. The sensitivity could be improved to 10(-12) g. All 26 culture-positive clinical samples (22 blood samples and 4 CSF samples) were positive with PCR. The gram-negative and gram-positive probes hybridized to clinical samples and to known bacterial controls, as predicted by Gram's stain characteristics.Our results suggest that the method of PCR and reverse hybridization is rapid, sensitive and specific in detecting bacterial infections. This finding may be significant in the clinical diagnosis of sepsis in neonates.Rapid identification and differentiation of Gram-negative and Gram-positive bacterial bloodstream infections by quantitative polymerase chain reaction in preterm infants.To evaluate the usefulness of the Gram-specific probe-based quantitative polymerase chain reaction test for rapid detection and differentiation of Gram-negative and Gram-positive bacterial bloodstream infection in preterm infants.Cross-sectional study.University-affiliated Level III neonatal intensive care unit.Preterm infants with clinical features suggestive of late-onset infection.None.In addition to the full sepsis screen, 0.5 mL of EDTA blood was collected aseptically for Gram-specific quantitative polymerase chain reaction evaluation. The results were analyzed with respect to outcomes of bacterial culture in blood and other body fluids, including peritoneal and cerebrospinal fluids. The diagnostic utilities of the quantitative polymerase chain reaction were determined. A total of 218 suspected infection episodes were investigated, of which 42 episodes were culture positive and 176 were culture negative. For Gram-negative infection, the quantitative polymerase chain reaction test correctly identified 19 of 22 episodes, and the sensitivity and specificity were 86.4% and 99.0%, respectively. For Gram-positive infection, the test correctly identified 14/19 episodes, and the sensitivity and specificity were 73.7% and 98.5%. The remaining one episode was Candida albicans septicemia. None of the episodes with positive quantitative polymerase chain reaction test were classified into the wrong Gram stain category. More importantly, despite negative blood culture in five infants suffering from intra-abdominal sepsis (peritonitis [n = 4] and hepatosplenic abscess [n = 1]), the quantitative polymerase chain reaction test could detect the Gram-specific category of causative organisms in blood.The Gram-specific quantitative polymerase chain reaction test is reliable and highly specific for rapid identification and differentiation of Gram-negative and Gram-positive bloodstream and intra-abdominal infections. The result could be made available within 5 hrs after the specimen reaches the laboratory. A positive test is able to "rule in" bacterial bloodstream infection before blood culture results become available, and serves as a guide to predict the virulence of the causative organism according to its Gram-specific category so that critical patients can be targeted for intensive treatment.PCR-based diagnosis of neonatal staphylococcal bacteremias.We compared PCR with blood cultures in the diagnosis of neonatal staphylococcal sepsis. Significant association was observed between PCR-based and culture-based diagnosis of staphylococcal bacteremia. Positive and negative predictive values for PCR were 100% and 98%, respectively. These data indicate that PCR may serve as a useful adjunct for the rapid diagnosis of staphylococcal sepsis.A multiplex nested PCR for the detection and identification of Candida species in blood samples of critically ill paediatric patients.Nosocomial candidaemia is associated with high mortality rates in critically ill paediatric patients; thus, the early detection and identification of the infectious agent is crucial for successful medical intervention. The PCR-based techniques have significantly increased the detection of Candida species in bloodstream infections. In this study, a multiplex nested PCR approach was developed for candidaemia detection in neonatal and paediatric intensive care patients.DNA samples from the blood of 54 neonates and children hospitalised in intensive care units with suspected candidaemia were evaluated by multiplex nested PCR with specific primers designed to identify seven Candida species, and the results were compared with those obtained from blood cultures.The multiplex nested PCR had a detection limit of four Candida genomes/mL of blood for all Candida species. Blood cultures were positive in 14.8% of patients, whereas the multiplex nested PCR was positive in 24.0% of patients, including all culture-positive patients. The results obtained with the molecular technique were available within 24 hours, and the assay was able to identify Candida species with 100% of concordance with blood cultures. Additionally, the multiplex nested PCR detected dual candidaemia in three patients.Our proposed PCR method may represent an effective tool for the detection and identification of Candida species in the context of candidaemia diagnosis in children, showing highly sensitive detection and the ability to identify the major species involved in this infection.[Evaluation of the LightCycler® SeptiFast test in newborns and infants with clinical suspicion of sepsis].Neonatal sepsis is a significant cause of morbidity and mortality. Early diagnosis and prompt antimicrobial therapy are crucial for a favorable outcome of the newborn child. Blood culture, the current "gold standard" method for diagnosing bloodstream infections, has a low sensitivity in newborns. We evaluated the multiplex real-time PCR LightCycler(®) SeptiFast (LC-SF) for detection of bloodstream infections in newborns, compared with conventional blood culture.A total of 42 blood samples were obtained from 35 subjects presenting with a febrile episode and hospitalized in neonatal intensive care unit at Hospital Universitario Virgen de las Nieves. Two samples were collected during each febrile episode in order to carry out LC-SF assay and blood culture, respectively.Sensitivity and specificity of 79% and 87%, respectively, compared with clinical diagnosis, were obtained for LC-SF. Contamination rate of blood cultures was 16.7%, mainly due to coagulase-negative staphylococci (CoNS) and viridans groups of streptococci. Contamination rate of LC-SF by CoNS was 2.4%. Concordance between LC-SF and blood culture was moderate (kappa index: 0.369). LC-SF demonstrated a higher concordance (kappa index: 0.729) with the final clinical diagnosis than blood culture (kappa index: 0.238).LC-SF assay could be a useful diagnostic tool, along with a conventional blood culture, in newborn, for confirming or ruling out those cases that blood culture could not determine, shortening the time to result to 7 hours.Comparison of 16S rRNA gene PCR and BACTEC 9240 for detection of neonatal bacteremia.Ten percent of infants born in the United States are admitted to neonatal intensive care units (NICU) annually. Approximately one-half of these admissions are from term infants (>34 weeks of gestation) at risk for systemic infection. Most of the term infants are not infected but rather have symptoms consistent with other medical conditions that mimic sepsis. The current standard of care for evaluating bacterial sepsis in the newborn is performing blood culturing and providing antibiotic therapy while awaiting the 48-h preliminary result of culture. Implementing a more rapid means of ruling out sepsis in term newborns could result in shorter NICU stays and less antibiotic usage. The purpose of this feasibility study was to compare the utility of PCR to that of conventional culture. To this end, a total of 548 paired blood samples collected from infants admitted to the NICU for suspected sepsis were analyzed for bacterial growth using the BACTEC 9240 instrument and for the bacterial 16S rRNA gene using a PCR assay which included a 5-h preamplification culturing step. The positivity rates by culture and PCR were 25 (4.6%) and 27 (4.9%) positive specimens out of a total of 548 specimens, respectively. The comparison revealed sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 96.0, 99. 4, 88.9, and 99.8%, respectively, for PCR. In summary, this PCR-based approach, requiring as little as 9 h of turnaround time and blood volumes as small as 200 microl, correlated well with conventional blood culture results obtained for neonates suspected of having bacterial sepsis.Diagnostic accuracy of a 16S ribosomal DNA gene-based molecular technique (RT-PCR, microarray, and sequencing) for bacterial meningitis, early-onset neonatal sepsis, and spontaneous bacterial peritonitis.The diagnostic accuracy of a 16S ribosomal DNA (rDNA) gene-based molecular technique for bacterial meningitis (BM), early-onset neonatal sepsis (EONS), and spontaneous bacterial peritonitis (SBP) is evaluated. The molecular approach gave better results for BM diagnosis: sensitivity (S) was 90.6% compared to 78.1% for the bacterial culture. Percentages of cases correctly diagnosed (CCD) were 91.7% and 80.6%, respectively. For EONS diagnosis, S was 60.0% for the molecular approach and 70.0% for the bacterial culture; and CCD was 95.2% and 96.4%, respectively. For SPB diagnosis, the molecular approach gave notably poorer results than the bacterial cultures. S and CCD were 48.4% and 56.4% for the molecular approach and 80.6% and 89.1% for bacterial cultures. Nevertheless, bacterial DNA was detected in 53.3% of culture-negative samples. Accuracy of the 16S rDNA PCR approach differs depending on the sample, the microorganisms involved, the expected bacterial load, and the presence of bacterial DNA other than that from the pathogen implied in the infectious disease.Laboratory diagnosis of late-onset sepsis in newborns by multiplex real-time PCR.Evaluating the near-term infant for early onset sepsis: progress and challenges to consider with 16S rDNA polymerase chain reaction testing.Although the rate of early onset sepsis in the near-term neonate is low (one to eight of 1,000 cases), the rate of mortality and morbidity is high. As a result, infants receive multiple, broad-spectrum antibiotic therapy, many for up to 7 days despite blood cultures showing no growth. Maternal intrapartum antibiotic prophylaxis and small blood volume collections from infants are cited as reasons for the lack of confidence in negative culture results. Incorporating an additional, more rapid test could facilitate a more timely diagnosis in these infants. To this end, a 16S rDNA polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay was compared to blood culturing for use as a tool in evaluating early onset sepsis. Of 1,751 neonatal intensive care unit admissions that were screened, 1,233 near-term infants met inclusion criteria. Compared to culture, PCR demonstrated excellent analytical specificity (1,186 of 1,216, 97.5%) and negative predictive value (1,186 of 1,196, 99.2%); however, PCR failed to detect a significant number of culture-proven cases. These findings underscore the cautionary stance that should be taken at this time when considering the use of a molecular amplification test for diagnosing neonatal sepsis. The experience gained from this study illustrates the need for changes in sample collection and preparation techniques so as to improve analytical sensitivity of the assay.Molecular detection of late-onset neonatal sepsis in premature infants using small blood volumes: proof-of-concept.Conventional blood culture is still the gold standard for sepsis diagnosis but results are not immediately available and pathogens are only detected in approximately 25% of cases. New molecular assays for the detection of blood stream pathogens are promising diagnostic tools.The aim of the study was to adapt and evaluate a multiplex PCR system using 100 µl blood. -46 blood specimens of very low birth weight infants (818 ± 242 g) with suspected sepsis were analyzed using the Roche SeptiFast MGRADE PCR with a modified DNA extraction protocol and software handling tool for decreased blood volume requirements.In the non-infected group, 5/21 infants had a positive PCR result with coagulase-negative staphylococci. All pathogens detected in the blood culture positive group (n = 15) were also detected by PCR. In addition, 4/6 patients had a positive PCR result in the clinical sepsis group (clinical and laboratory signs of sepsis but negative blood culture). Overall, the PCR was demonstrated to have a higher sensitivity (90.5%; 95%CI 68.2-98.3%) in comparison to blood culture (71.4%; 95%CI 47.7-87.8%) including clinical sepsis cases, even though it had a lower specificity (80.0%; 95%CI 58.7-92.4% versus 100.0%; 95%CI 83.4-100.0%).These first data demonstrate the usability and potential benefit of this multiplex PCR using a modified DNA extraction for the rapid detection of nosocomial sepsis in preterm infants in addition to blood culture.The usefulness of the buffy coat smear and panbacterial polymerase chain reaction in early diagnosis of neonatal sepsis.In this study are evaluated the usefulness of the buffy coat smear and panbacterial polymerase chain reaction (PCR) as diagnostic tests in the early detection of neonatal sepsis.It was studied 49 patients aged up to 28 days who were hospitalized in the Intensive Care Unit (ICUs) of the Neonatology, with a clinical diagnosis of neonatal sepsis and 49 umbilical cord samples of healthy newborns. Blood cultures and 50 microL of plasma were taken for the DNA and performance of the broad-range PCR primer system (panbacterial PCR). Simultaneously, were taken three capillaries with blood for the leukocyte layer (buffy coat) smear, we performed three stains: Gram; Löeffler blue methylene (LBM), and acridine orange (AO). Statistical analysis included sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) against the clinical diagnosis.With respect to stains of buffy coat smear, they resulted very specific, from 90-97%, with 64-75% sensitivity, 87-94% PPV, and 77-82% NPV. In inverse fashion, PCR resulted very sensitive at 96%, with 91% specificity, 92% PPV, and 96% NPV.Buffy coat smear stains are easy, fast, and specific, while that of PCR was highly sensitive. Thus, both can be utilized as diagnostic tests.Diagnosis of neonatal sepsis by broad-range 16S real-time polymerase chain reaction.The standard diagnostic test (blood culture) for suspected neonatal sepsis has limitations in sensitivity and specificity, and 16S polymerase chain reaction (PCR) has been suggested as a new diagnostic tool for neonatal sepsis.To develop and evaluate a new real-time PCR method for detection of bacterial DNA in blood samples collected from infants with suspected neonatal sepsis.Immediately after blood culture, a study sample of 0.5-1.0 ml whole blood was collected and used for a novel 16S real-time PCR assay. All positive samples were sequenced. Detailed case studies were performed in all cases with conflicting results, to verify if PCR could detect pathogens in culture negative sepsis.368 samples from 317 infants were included. When compared with blood culture, the assay yielded a sensitivity of 79%, a specificity of 90%, a positive predictive value of 59%, and a negative predictive value of 96%. Seven of the 31 samples with a positive PCR result and a negative blood culture had definite or suspected bacterial sepsis. In five samples, PCR (but not blood culture) could detect a pathogen that was present in a blood culture collected more than 24 h prior to the PCR sample.This study presents an evaluation of a new real-time PCR technique that can detect culture-positive sepsis, and suggests that PCR has the potential to detect bacteria in culture-negative samples even after the initiation of intravenous antibiotics.Multiplex PCR allows rapid and accurate diagnosis of bloodstream infections in newborns and children with suspected sepsis.Sepsis is a major health problem in newborns and children. Early detection of pathogens allows initiation of appropriate antimicrobial therapy that strongly correlates with positive outcomes. Multiplex PCR has the potential to rapidly identify bloodstream infections, compensating for the loss of blood culture sensitivity. In an Italian pediatric hospital, multiplex PCR (the LightCycler SeptiFast test) was compared to routine blood culture with 1,673 samples obtained from 803 children with suspected sepsis; clinical and laboratory information was used to determine the patient infection status. Excluding results attributable to contaminants, SeptiFast showed a sensitivity of 85.0% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 78.7 to 89.7%) and a specificity of 93.5% (95% CI = 92.1 to 94.7%) compared to blood culture. The rate of positive results was significantly higher with SeptiFast (14.6%) than blood culture (10.3%) (P < 0.0001), and the overall positivity rate was 16.1% when the results of both tests were combined. Staphylococcus aureus (11.6%), coagulase-negative staphylococci (CoNS) (29.6%), Pseudomonas aeruginosa (16.5%), and Klebsiella spp. (10.1%) were the most frequently detected. SeptiFast identified 97 additional isolates that blood culture failed to detect (24.7% P. aeruginosa, 23.7% CoNS, 14.4% Klebsiella spp., 14.4% Candida spp.). Among specimens taken from patients receiving antibiotic therapy, we also observed a significantly higher rate of positivity of SeptiFast than blood culture (14.1% versus 6.5%, respectively; P < 0.0001). On the contrary, contaminants were significantly more frequent among blood cultures than SeptiFast (n = 97 [5.8%] versus n = 26 [1.6%]), respectively; P < 0.0001). SeptiFast served as a highly valuable adjunct to conventional blood culture in children, adding diagnostic value and shortening the time to result (TTR) to 6 h.Evaluation of a real-time fluorescent PCR assay for rapid detection of Group B Streptococci in neonatal blood.Streptococcus agalactiae (Group B Streptococcus: GBS) is the major causative agent of neonatal sepsis. Neonates at risk for GBS infections are empirically administered broad-spectrum antibiotics for at least 48 h pending blood culture results. A rapid assay to expedite detection of GBS would facilitate initiation of specific antibiotic therapy. Conversely, expeditious proof of absence of infection will avoid unnecessary antibiotic use. Using the LightCycler, we evaluated a hybridization probe polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay to detect GBS-specific cfb gene target DNA sequence in blood specimens. Both sensitivity and specificity of the real-time PCR assay was 100%. The assay demonstrated 100% specificity when tested against 26 non-GBS bacteria. This method is capable of detecting as few as approximately 100 copies or 10 pg of GBS genomic DNA. This real-time PCR method is rapid, sensitive, and specific for the detection of GBS in neonatal blood samples and holds great promise in its utility in the diagnostic laboratory.Values of C-reactive protein, procalcitonin, and Staphylococcus-specific PCR in neonatal late-onset sepsis.To evaluate the predictive value of relevant clinical and laboratory parameters (complete blood count (CBC), C-reactive protein (CRP), procalcitonin (PCT) and Staphylococcus-specific polymerase chain reaction (PCR)) in neonates with suspected late-onset sepsis (LOS).NICU neonates were prospectively followed for septic events. One hundred and eleven neonates developed 148 suspected septic events beyond 3 d of age. We recorded the clinical signs and laboratory abnormalities at onset of sepsis, serum CRP and PCT, Staphylococcus-specific PCR, microbiological data, and empiric antimicrobial therapy.Variables significantly associated with subsequently confirmed LOS included hypotension (relative risk (RR) = 5.6, 95% CI 3.29-9.53), mechanical ventilation (RR = 2.46, 95% CI 1.24-4.86), immature/total neutrophil ratio (I/T) > 0.2 (RR = 5.13, 95% CI 2.54-10.31), CRP > 1.0 mg/dl (RR = 2.85, 95% CI 1.32-6.15), and small-for-gestational-age (SGA) status (RR = 2.13, 95% CI 1.03-4.38). PCT was not significantly associated with LOS. For detection of staphylococcal bacteremia, Staphylococcus-specific PCR showed: sensitivity 57.1%, specificity 94.7%, positive predictive value 53.3%, and negative predictive value 95.4%.Hypotension, mechanical ventilation, I/T > 0.2, CRP > 1.0 mg/dl, and SGA status at onset of sepsis are significant predictors of proven neonatal LOS. Staphylococcus-specific PCR might be of value in ruling out staphylococcal sepsis.Rapid diagnosis of sepsis and bacterial meningitis in children with real-time fluorescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction amplification in the bacterial 16S rRNA gene.A method for the detection of bacterial pathogens in sepsis and bacterial meningitis with 16S rRNA gene- based real-time fluorescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction (FQ-PCR) is developed. A total of 190 blood specimens and 5 cerebrospinal fluid specimens from neonates with suspected sepsis or bacterial meningitis were evaluated with 16S rRNA gene-based real-time FQ-PCR assay. The positive rate of the real-time FQ-PCR assay was significantly higher (25/195, 12.82%) than that of bacterial culture (15/195, 7.69%; P = .002). When bacterial culture was used as a control, the sensitivity of the real-time FQ-PCR was 100%, the specificity was 94.4%, and Youden's index was 0.944. This study suggests that 16S rRNA gene-based real-time FQ-PCR assay is an important and accurate method in the detection of bacterial pathogens of sepsis and bacterial meningitis and should have a promising usage in the diagnosis of sepsis and bacterial meningitis.Gram stain-specific-probe-based real-time PCR for diagnosis and discrimination of bacterial neonatal sepsis.Sepsis is a serious disease with high mortality in newborns. It is very important to have a convenient and accurate method for pathogenic diagnosis of neonatal sepsis. We developed a method of simultaneous detection and Gram classification of clinically relevant bacterial pathogens causing sepsis directly from blood samples with Gram stain-specific-probe-based real-time PCR (GSPBRT-PCR). With GSPBRT-PCR, 53 clinically important strains representing 25 gram-positive and 28 gram-negative bacterial species were identified correctly with the corresponding Gram probe. The limits of the GSPBRT-PCR assay in serial dilutions of the bacteria revealed that Staphylococcus aureus could be detected at concentrations of 3 CFU per PCR and Escherichia coli at concentrations as low as 1 CFU per PCR. The GSPBRT-PCR assay was further evaluated on 600 blood specimens from patients with suspicion of neonatal sepsis and compared to the results obtained from blood cultures. The positive rate of the GSPBRT-PCR array was 50/600 (8.33%), significantly higher than that of blood culture (34/600; 5.67%) (P = 0.00003). When blood culture was used as a control, the sensitivity of GSPBRT-PCR was 100%, the specificity was 97.17%, and the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.972. This study suggests that GSPBRT-PCR is very useful for the rapid and accurate diagnosis of bacterial infection and that it can have an important impact on the current inappropriate and unnecessary use of antibiotics in the treatment of newborns.Real-time PCR of the 16S-rRNA gene in the diagnosis of neonatal bacteraemia.To evaluate a real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of neonatal bacteraemia.Two hundred ninety-five plasma samples from 288 newborns with suspected neonatal sepsis were collected prospectively for the purpose of polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based bacterial detection. A real-time PCR targeting the bacterial gene for 16S-rRNA gene combined with four specific probes designed to detect Gram-negative bacteria, Staphylococcus aureus and coagulase-negative staphylococci (CoNS) was developed. All samples positive in the universal PCR were further sequenced for bacterial identification.When applied to a material from 50 patients with positive blood culture and 245 patients with negative blood culture, the universal PCR showed a sensitivity of 42% (28-57), a specificity of 95% (92-97), a positive predictive value of 64% (45-80), and a negative predictive value of 89% (84-92) (95% confidence intervals in brackets).A new real-time PCR technique was for the first time applied to a well-defined prospectively and consecutively enrolled material of newborns with suspected sepsis, combining the benefits of real-time PCR with specific probes and sequencing. The method managed to detect bacteraemia with high specificity even though the sensitivity was low. Factors causing the low sensitivity are identified and further strategies to develop the method are described.Comparison of 16S rRNA gene PCR and blood culture for diagnosis of neonatal sepsis.Septicemia is a common cause of morbidity and mortality among newborns in the developing world. However, accurate clinical diagnosis of neonatal sepsis is often difficult because symptoms and signs are often nonspecific. Blood culture has been the gold standard for confirmation of the diagnosis. However, the sensitivity is low and results are usually not promptly obtained. Therefore, the diagnosis of sepsis is often based on clinical signs in association with laboratory tests such as platelets count, immature/total neutrophils ratio (I/T), and a rise in C-reactive protein (CRP). Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) methods for the detection of neonatal sepsis represent new diagnostic tools for the early identification of pathogens.During a 4-month prospective study, 16S rRNA PCR was compared with conventional blood culture for the diagnosis of neonatal bacterial sepsis. In addition, the relationship between known risk factors, clinical signs, laboratory parameters, and the diagnosis of sepsis was considered.Sepsis was suspected in 706 infants from the intensive neonatal care unit. They all were included in the study. The number of positive cultures and positive PCR results were 95 (13.5%) and 123 (17.4%), respectively. Compared with blood culture, the diagnosis of bacterial sepsis by PCR revealed a 100.0% sensitivity, 95.4% specificity, 77.2% positive predictive value, and 100.0% negative predictive value. In this study, Apgar scores at 5 min, weight, icterus, irritability, feeding difficulties, gestational age (GA), premature rupture of membrane (PRM), platelets count, I/T, and a marked rise in CRP were important in establishing the diagnosis of sepsis in the newborn. In addition, weight, GA, PRM, irritability, duration of antibiotic usage, mortality rate, and number of purulent meningitis cases were significantly different between early-onset sepsis and late-onset sepsis.16S rRNA PCR increased the sensitivity in detecting bacterial DNA in newborns with signs of sepsis, allowed a rapid detection of the pathogens, and led to shorter antibiotic courses. However, uncertainty about the bacterial cause of sepsis was not reduced by this method. 16S rRNA PCR needs to be further developed and improved. Blood culture is currently irreplaceable, since pure isolates are essential for antimicrobial drug susceptibility testing.Real-time polymerase chain reaction for detecting bacterial DNA directly from blood of neonates being evaluated for sepsis.Speed is of the essence when evaluating an infant with symptoms consistent with sepsis. Because of the high morbidity and mortality associated with neonatal sepsis, infants receive multiple, broad-spectrum antibiotics before receiving finalized blood culture results. Incorporating an additional, reliable, yet rapid assay to detect bacteria directly from blood would facilitate timely diagnosis and appropriate care. To this end, we designed a real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay targeting the highly conserved 380 bases of 16S rDNA. DNA was extracted from whole-blood samples using a Qiagen column. The limit of detection for the TaqMan-based assay, using a Smartcycler instrument, was 40, 50, or 2000 colony-forming units per milliliter of blood (CFU/ml) of Escherichia coli, group B Streptococcus, and Listeria monocytogenes, respectively, when white blood cell counts were below 39,000/microl. Implementing this approach requires less than 4 hours for both sample preparation and real-time PCR compared with 1 to 2 days to detect growth in culture or 5 days to finalize no-growth culture results. There was an overall agreement between the results of culture and real-time PCR of 94.1% (80 of 85) in this study. These results suggest that molecular techniques can augment culture-based methods for diagnosing neonatal sepsis, especially in infants whose mothers have received intrapartum antibiotic prophylaxis.A novel diagnostic tool for detecting neonatal infections using multiplex polymerase chain reaction.In newborns with infections, it is necessary to detect various pathogens rapidly and accurately, because the infections are often fatal when diagnosis is delayed. However, no diagnostic tools that rapidly detect pathogens causing neonatal infectious diseases are available.To establish a rapid diagnostic tool using multiplex polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to detect 8 major pathogens that often cause neonatal infections, including Group B Streptococcus, Escherichia coli, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus, Ureaplasma urealyticum, herpes simplex virus, Cytomegalovirus, and Candida albicans, and to validate this tool in the neonatal intensive care unit (NICU).One hundred and thirty clinical samples were obtained from newborns with any infectious signs or histories. DNA was extracted from these samples and multiplex PCR was performed with a mixture of 8 primer pairs, all designed to amplify pathogenic DNA and produce different sizes of amplicons. Seventy-seven samples with suspicion of bacterial infections were also examined by bacterial culture to evaluate the accuracy of the multiplex PCR results.Six of the 8 pathogens could be rapidly detected by our multiplex PCR method, within 3.5-4.5 h. These positive results led us to immediately diagnose and select proper drugs against each pathogen. In comparison with culture results, our test characteristics were as follows: specificity: 93%, negative predictive value: 96%, and concordance rate: 90%.We have established and validated a rapid diagnostic tool for detecting pathogens using multiplex PCR, which may be useful for the confirmed diagnosis of neonatal infections in the NICU.Detection of fungemia by polymerase chain reaction in critically ill neonates and children.To compare polymerase chain reaction (PCR) with blood culture for the detection of fungemia in neonatal and pediatric intensive care unit patients.A total of 0.2 to 0.5 ml of blood was collected simultaneously with blood culture in patients with suspected sepsis. Following DNA extraction, the gene for fungal 18S rRNA was amplified and PCR products analyzed by agarose gel electrophoresis.Of 70 patient samples, nine of nine with a positive blood culture for Candida were PCR positive, and one of four with a positive blood culture for Malassezia was PCR positive. In total, 13 of 57 samples with negative blood culture for fungus were PCR positive. Seven of these 13 patients had other evidence of invasive fungal disease. In contrast, none of the 44 blood culture-negative/PCR-negative patients had other evidence of fungal infection.PCR may be a useful adjunct to blood culture for the rapid detection of fungemia in high-risk patients.Development of a multiplex real-time PCR assay for the rapid diagnosis of neonatal late onset sepsis.The diagnosis of late onset sepsis (LOS), a severe condition with high prevalence in preterm infants, is hampered by the suboptimal sensitivity and long turnaround time of blood culture. Detection of the infecting pathogen directly in blood by PCR would provide a much more timely result. Unfortunately, PCR-based assays reported so far are labor intensive and often lack direct species identification. Therefore we developed a real-time multiplex PCR assay tailored to LOS diagnosis which is easy-to-use, is applicable on small blood volumes and provides species-specific results within 4h. Species-specific PCR assays were selected from literature or developed using bioinformatic tools for the detection of the most prevalent etiologic pathogens: Enterococcus faecalis, Staphylococcus aureus, Staphylococcus spp., Streptococcus agalactiae, Escherichia coli, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Klebsiella spp. and Serratia marcescens. The PCR assays showed 100% specificity, full coverage of the target pathogens and a limit of detection (LOD) of ≤10CFUeq./reaction. These LOD values were maintained in the multiplex format or when bacterial DNA was isolated from blood. Clinical evaluation showed high concordance between the multiplex PCR and blood culture. In conclusion, we developed a multiplex PCR that allows the direct detection of the most important bacterial pathogens causing LOS in preterm infants. Rapid detection of neonatal sepsis using polymerase chain reaction.Clinical diagnosis of sepsis in newborn infants is not easy and there is no laboratory test with 100% specificity and sensitivity, with the exception of blood culture, the results of which are not available for at least 48-72 h. Polymerase chain reaction methodology has been used to diagnose different bacterial, viral and protozoal infections, and the possibility of amplifying the DNA region common to all bacteria could represent an optimal method for the diagnosis of sepsis. The authors have performed PCR in a group of 33 neonates at risk for early-onset sepsis, correlating molecular data with blood culture results. The presence of bacterial DNA in blood samples was evaluated, amplifying the DNA region encoding the 16S rRNA. There were no false negative results (four positive blood cultures and four positive PCR), with competitive costs and time. This method also allows the diagnosis of sepsis due to uncommon species and also, using a second PCR with specific primers, an aetiological diagnosis.Comparison of broad range 16S rDNA PCR and conventional blood culture for diagnosis of sepsis in the newborn: a case control study.Early onset bacterial sepsis is a feared complication of the newborn. A large proportion of infants admitted to the Neonatal Intensive Care Unit (NICU) for suspected sepsis receive treatment with potent systemic antibiotics while a diagnostic workup is in progress. The gold standard for detecting bacterial sepsis is blood culture. However, as pathogens in blood cultures are only detected in approximately 25% of patients, the sensitivity of blood culture is suspected to be low. Therefore, the diagnosis of sepsis is often based on the development of clinical signs, in combination with laboratory tests such as a rise in C-reactive protein (CRP). Molecular assays for the detection of bacterial DNA in the blood represent possible new diagnostic tools for early identification of a bacterial cause.A broad range 16S rDNA polymerase chain reaction (PCR) without preincubation was compared to conventional diagnostic work up for clinical sepsis, including BACTEC blood culture, for early determination of bacterial sepsis in the newborn. In addition, the relationship between known risk factors, clinical signs, and laboratory parameters considered in clinical sepsis in the newborn were explored.Forty-eight infants with suspected sepsis were included in this study. Thirty-one patients were diagnosed with sepsis, only 6 of these had a positive blood culture. 16S rDNA PCR analysis of blinded blood samples from the 48 infants revealed 10 samples positive for the presence of bacterial DNA. PCR failed to be positive in 2 samples from blood culture positive infants, and was positive in 1 sample where a diagnosis of a non-septic condition was established. Compared to blood culture the diagnosis of bacterial proven sepsis by PCR revealed a 66.7% sensitivity, 87.5% specificity, 95.4% positive and 75% negative predictive value. PCR combined with blood culture revealed bacteria in 35.1% of the patients diagnosed with sepsis. Irritability and feeding difficulties were the clinical signs most often observed in sepsis. CRP increased in the presence of bacterial infection.There is a need for PCR as a method to quickly point out the infants with sepsis. However, uncertainty about a bacterial cause of sepsis was not reduced by the PCR result, reflecting that methodological improvements are required in order for DNA detection to replace or supplement traditional blood culture in diagnosis of bacterial sepsis.[A broad-range 16S rRNA gene real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of neonatal septicemia].To evaluate the usefulness of a broad-range real-time PCR assay aimed at the 16S rRNA gene of bacteria in a clinical setting in rapid and reliable diagnosis of neonatal septicemia for improving the speed and accuracy of bacterial detection.The universal primer and TaqMan probe were designed based on the highly conserved sequences of the bacterial 16S rRNA gene. The chosen primers and probe did not show any likely cross hybridization with human, viral or fungal genome sequences. The TaqMan assay used the fluorescent signal on the probe, such as 6-carboxyfluorescin (6-FAM), and quenched by the standard 6-carboxytetramethylrhodamine (TAMRA) probes. The broad-range 16S rRNA gene real-time PCR array was established. Then, three common pathogenic microorganisms including Staphylococcus aureus, Staphylococcus epidermidis and Escherichia coli, which were prepared by a 10-fold dilution series respectively from 10(8) colony forming unit (CFU)/ml to 10(3) CFU/ml, as well as controls, were used for testing of both sensitivity and specificity of the real-time PCR assay. The blood samples from 830 cases of suspected septicemia, who were hospitalized in our neonatal ward and the neonatal intensive care unit (NICU) and developed clinical signs suggestive of infection, were tested with routine culture and bacterial 16S rRNA genes real-time PCR separately. In addition, 30 neonates without infection were enrolled as the negative control group.All the three common pathogenic bacterial species were positive on the 16S rRNA genes real-time PCR assay. There were no cross-reaction with cytomegalovirus (CMV), Epstein-Barr virus (EBV), hepatitis B virus (HBV), fungi, human DNA and blank control, and the technique showed high specificity and sensitivity. The detection limit of the TaqMan assay was tested by amplifying serial dilutions of the three common pathogenic bacterial DNA. The minimal detection limit of the TaqMan system was equivalent to 3 CFU of bacteria, the threshold cycle (CT), which is inversely proportional to the log of the amount of target DNA initially present, was 37.90 by calculation. The real-time PCR assay was evaluated on 830 blood specimens for suspected neonatal septicemia, as compared to the results obtained from the routine bacterial cultures. The positive rate by the real-time PCR assay was 5.18% (43/830) in 830 samples, and was significantly higher than that of blood culture [2.41% (20/830) (P < 0.01)]. The real-time PCR was positive in all the 20 positive blood culture samples. Thirty non-infectious blood samples were negative by both the PCR assay and blood cultures. When blood culture was used as control, the sensitivity of the real-time PCR assay was 100%, the specificity was 97.16%, and the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.972. Moreover, three of the PCR positive amplicons were confirmed by sequencing to confirm the accuracy of the real-time PCR assay in testing clinical specimens. The sequencing showed that except for one sequence, all the others were demonstrated to be Staphylococcus aureus and Escherichia coli respectively, which was in accord with the results of the blood cultures.The bacterial 16S rRNA genes real-time PCR had been established to diagnose the neonatal septicemia. The sensitivity and specificity the real-time PCR assay were higher than those of blood culture. This technique can provide a rapid way for the etiological diagnosis of neonatal septicemia, and was a convenient and accurate method in etiologic diagnosis of neonatal septicemia.[Rapid diagnosis of neonatal sepsis by 16SrRNA genes PCR amplification and genechip hybridization].To explore a method for rapid diagnosis of sepsis in newborn infants.(1) The primers and oligonucleotide probes were designed and synthesized based on the sequences of bacterial 16SrRNA gene. The gene chip was prepared through the probes printed onto special glass slides. The gene chip included 18 special probes: universal probe 1, universal probe 2, Gram positive bacterial probe, Gram negative bacterial probe 1, Gram negative bacterial probe 2, Staphylococcus aureus, coagulase negative staphylococcus (CoNS) 1, CoNS 2, Escherichia coli, Hemophilus influenzae, Listeria monocytogenes, Streptococcus pneumoniae, Streptococcus agalactiae, Bacteroides fragilis, Bacillus, Meningococcus, Corynebacterium, Propionibacterium; (2) Blood specimens from 285 cases of suspected septicemia were cultured and bacterial 16S rRNA gene was detected separately; DNA isolated from blood specimens and cerebrospinal fluid was amplified by PCR, and PCR products were hybridized with the probes on the gene chips. Hybridization results were scanned and read by laser-scanner.(1) Of the 285 cases, 17 were positive by PCR and the positive rate (5.96%) was significantly higher than that of blood culture (2.81%) (P < 0.01). When blood culture was taken as control, the sensitivity of PCR was 100% and Specificity was 96.75%, the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.968. (2) The 17 specimens which showed positive results by PCR were further hybridized on the gene chip. All were positive by universal probes. Among all of them, 5 were positive by E. coli probe; 4 were positive by Staphylococcus epidermidis; two were positive by Bacillus and Propionibacterium probes, separately; 4 were positive by CoNS. The 8 specimens which showed positive results by both PCR and blood culture, the result of gene chip hybridization coincided with the result of blood culture.Detection of the bacterial 16SrRNA genes in clinical specimens by gene chip hybridization technology can diagnose neonatal septicemia rapidly. This method has higher sensitivity and specificity than blood culture or other methods and can provide a rapid way for the etiological diagnosis of neonatal septicemia. Therefore the genechip method may be valuable and practical in early diagnosis of neonatal septicemia.[Rapid diagnosis of common pathogenic bacteria infection in newborn infants by 16SrDNA oligonucleotide array].The rapid identification of pathogenic bacteria is important for earlier effective patient management and antimicrobial therapy, especially for the infant patient, whose immunological system is not fully developed. However conventional microbiogical techniques of bacterial identification, culture and isolation of pathogenic bacteria, identification by biochemistry and serological assay, are time-consuming and require intensive labor. On the basis of special gene sequence, PCR provides simple and rapid way to identify bacteria. But it is difficult to identify all of bacteria species which are suspicious of pathogenic agents. Oligonucleotide arrays provide a powerful tool for parallel detection of target genes. The objective of this study was to test a reverse oligonucleotide assay, which hybridize with the PCR product of 16SrDNA using a pair of universal primers, to rapidly identify common infant pathogenic bacteria.By comparison and analysis of the 16SrDNA sequences of common pathogenic bacteria, a region, which has numerous sequence variations and flanked by highly conserved sequences, was found. A pair of universal primers was designed according to its flanking conservative sequence, and a set of probes specially targeting to eight species of infant pathogenic bacteria, including staphylococcus aureus, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Klebsiella pneumoniae, Streptococcus faecalis, Hemophilus influenzae, Enterobacter cloacae, Escherichia coli, and Acinetobacter baumannii,according to the variable sequences. The probes were fixed on the nylon membrane with positive electricity, and hybridized them with the products of PCR using the universal primers.The universal primers could amplify the target sequence from bacteria including the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria and Staphylococcus epidermidis, Enterobacter aerogenes, Streptococcus pneumoniae,beta-hemolytic streptococcus, Neisseria meningitides, Citrobacter freundii, Bacillus subtilis, and Salmonella infantis,but could not amplify rotavirus and human DNA as control. The results showed that the oligonucleotide array could specially hybridize with the eight bacteria to be examined and could not hybridize with other bacteria. The lowest concentration of DNA (product of PCR) for oligonucleotide array was about 25 ng/ml. The results proved that the probes are highly selective and the oligonucleotide arrays could parallelly detect the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria. The results suggested that the oligonucleotide array system was able to identify the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria from clinical specimens and the results were the same as identified by automated bacterial detection machine. From the further experiments, the oligonucleotide array system could directly diagnose the common infant pathogenic bacteria from the broths of samples culture.Despite limited number of identifiable bacteria and lack of information on antibiotic susceptibility of bacteria, the reverse oligonucleotide assay system, which contains amplification of the segment of 16rDNA from samples using the universal primers and parallel detection of PCR products using specific probes, is an effective method to rapidly identify the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria.Polymerase chain reaction in rapid diagnosis of neonatal sepsis.In a prospective study a total of hundred neonates who fulfilled the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology's (ACOG) criteria for probable sepsis admitted to NICU of tertiary care armed forces hospital were investigated for evidence of sepsis. The investigation protocol included sepsis screen, blood culture and 1 mL of venous blood for molecular analysis by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for bacterial DNA component encoding 16 s RNA in all cases. 100 newborns with probable sepsis were studied to evaluate the molecular diagnosis of sepsis using PCR amplification of 16 S RNA in newborns with risk factors for sepsis or those who have clinical evidence of sepsis. We compared the results of PCR with blood culture and other markers of sepsis screen (total leucocyte count (TLC), absolute neutrophil count (ANC), immature/total neutrophil count ratio (I/T ratio), peripheral blood smear, micro ESR and C reactive protein (CRP). Controls consisted of 30 normal healthy newborns with no overt evidence of sepsis. Sepsis screen was positive in 24 (24%) of cases in study group with sensitivity and specificity of 100% and 83.5% respectively. Blood culture was positive in 09(9%t) with sensitivity of 69.2% and specificity of 100%. PCR was positive in 13(13%) of cases (9% are both blood culture and sepsis screen positive and 4% are positive by sepsis screen); the sensitivity of PCR was 100% and specificity was 95.6%. Blood culture is the most reliable method for diagnosis of neonatal sepsis. Polymerase chain reaction is useful and superior to blood culture for early diagnosis of sepsis in neonates.The use of molecular techniques for bacterial detection in the analysis of gastric aspirates collected from infants on the first day of life.Prospective service evaluation of the utility of molecular methods to analyse neonatal gastric aspirate specimens in a single neonatal unit and associated maternity unit. 43 newborn infants investigated for sepsis with median gestational age of 39 weeks (range 31-41 weeks) and median birth weight 3050 grams (range 1250-4220 g). Gastric aspirates routinely collected within 12h of birth were analysed using conventional and molecular methods for bacterial detection, bacterial DNA load and sequencing to identified bacterial species.Bacterial DNA loads varied from 0.03 to 1736 pg/microl of DNA extract (1 microl of DNA extract equivalent to 4 microl gastric aspirate). Bacteria were identified in 30/43 (70%) of samples by molecular methods and 10/43 (23.3%) of samples by culture. Cultures were only positive when the bacterial DNA exceeded 4.5 pg/microl of extract. Infants with prolonged rupture of membranes (>24h prior to delivery) had a DNA load on average 23 times higher than those without (95%CI 3.7 to 141; p=0.001). Additional bacteria detected by molecular methods included many species that are fastidious and potentially pathogenic including Leptotrichia spp., Serratia spp., Ureaplasma spp., Veillonella spp., Haemophilus influenzae and Group B Streptococcus. Due to a low rate of adverse outcomes it was not possible to correlate bacterial identifications or DNA load with infant outcome.Molecular methods can identify bacteria from a greater proportion of gastric aspirate specimens that conventional culture. Further work is required to establish whether this information can be used to improve infant outcomes.Efficacy of bacterial ribosomal RNA-targeted reverse transcription-quantitative PCR for detecting neonatal sepsis: a case control study.Neonatal sepsis is difficult to diagnose and pathogens cannot be detected from blood cultures in many cases. Development of a rapid and accurate method for detecting pathogens is thus essential. The main purpose of this study was to identify etiological agents in clinically diagnosed neonatal sepsis using bacterial ribosomal RNA-targeted reverse transcription-quantitative PCR (BrRNA-RT-qPCR) and to conduct comparisons with the results of conventional blood culture. Since BrRNA-RT-qPCR targets bacterial ribosomal RNA, detection rates using this approach may exceed those using conventional PCR.Subjects comprised 36 patients with 39 episodes of suspected neonatal sepsis who underwent BrRNA-RT-qPCR and conventional blood culture to diagnose sepsis. Blood samples were collected aseptically for BrRNA-RT-qPCR and blood culture at the time of initial sepsis evaluation by arterial puncture. BrRNA-RT-qPCR and blood culture were undertaken using identical blood samples, and BrRNA-RT-qPCR was performed using 12 primer sets.Positive rate was significantly higher for BrRNA-RT-qPCR (15/39, 38.5%) than for blood culture (6/39, 15.4%; p = 0.0039). BrRNA-RT-qPCR was able to identify all pathogens detected by blood culture. Furthermore, this method detected pathogens from neonates with clinical sepsis in whom pathogens was not detected by culture methods.This RT-PCR technique is useful for sensitive detection of pathogens causing neonatal sepsis, even in cases with negative results by blood culture.Urine Nested Polymerase Chain Reaction in Neonatal Septicemia.This cross-sectional study was done to evaluate diagnostic efficacy of urine nested polymerase chain reaction (PCR) using broad-range 16SrDNA PCR-based amplification, followed by restriction analysis and sequencing in neonatal septicemia. The study included 50 babies; 48% had vaginal delivery, 46% were preterm, 20% had a history of prolonged rupture of membranes and 56% were low birth weight (≤2500 g). Clinical presentations were lethargy (96%), respiratory distress (80%) and bleeding diathesis (16%). Absolute neutrophil count <1800/mm(3) was observed in 60%, and positive C-reactive protein in 46%. Thirty neonates had positive blood culture, and Klebsiella pneumoniae (22%) was the predominant organism. Nested urine PCR was positive in 38 (76%) and detected bacterial DNA in 8 neonates with negative blood cultures. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of nested PCR were 100, 60, 78.9, 100 and 84%, respectively, compared with blood culture. Nested PCR can detect most bacteria in single assay and identify unusual and unexpected causal agents. Approach to term neonates born after maternal intrapartum fever and unknown maternal group B Streptococcus status: value of serum C-reactive protein and 16S rRNA gene PCR amplification.Thirty-six term neonates born after maternal intrapartum fever, with premature rupture of membranes <18 hours and unknown maternal group B Streptococcus status had blood samples for complete blood count, C-reactive protein, culture, and 16S rRNA gene polymerase chain reaction amplification. Only 2 neonates were symptomatic and none had leukopenia, C-reactive protein >1.0 mg/dL, bacteremia, or positive polymerase chain reaction.Results and relevance of molecular detection of pathogens by SeptiFast--a retrospective analysis in 75 critically ill children.Sepsis is a common cause of death in children. Early detection of bloodstream pathogens is crucial for the appropriate antibio­tic treatment. Blood cultures (BC) are the gold standard test used for detection. Recently, additional molecular detection methods of microbial DNA by multiplex PCR (SeptiFast, SF) have become available.Our retrospective study was aimed to compare results of BC to those of SF regarding results and therapeutic relevance.We identified a total of 110 SF samples in 75 patients with suspected systemic infection by retrospective chart review. Each patient underwent SF and BC testing simultaneously.The initial analysis displayed no statistical significant difference in positive SF results compared to BC (p=0.19): in 26 of 110 samples (24%) microbial DNA was found. 19 BC (17%) showed microbial growth. 14 samples were positive in SF but negative in BC (13%). In patients who were pretreated with antibiotics (n=97) pathogens were identified in 24 samples by SF (25%) but only in 11 samples by BC (11%). Based on the clinical presentation and the spectrum of bacterial isolates 3 BC were considered contaminated. Considering this, SF yielded pathogens significantly more often than BC in the overall study population (p=0.04). SF results were available at least 31 h before BC results. Based on SF result antibiotic therapy was adjusted in 14 patients (13%).Molecular detection of pathogens by SF was faster and more frequently positive than BC. We have therefore demonstrated that SF might be superior to BC in testing for bloodstream pathogens. Prospective multicentric studies are required to determine whether this hypothesis can be maintained.Non-culture detection of Streptococcus agalactiae (Lancefield group B Streptococcus) in clinical samples by real-time PCR.A real-time PCR assay targeting the cylB gene was developed to detect Streptococcus agalactiae [Lancefield group B Streptococcus (GBS)] from clinical samples. A total of 110 blood culture-negative samples [75 cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) and 35 EDTA blood samples] from neonates with probable GBS sepsis or meningitis were analysed. Among these, 16 of the 75 CSF samples were positive [21.3%, 95% confidence interval (CI) 12.7-32.3%] and two of the 35 EDTA blood samples were positive (5.7%, 95% CI 0.7-19.2%). The proportion testing positive in the CSF samples was significantly higher than in the EDTA blood samples (P=0.05, Fisher's exact test). Overall, this real-time PCR assay was shown to be superior to culture methods for detection of GBS from CSF and EDTA blood samples.Use of pyrosequencing of 16S rRNA fragments to differentiate between bacteria responsible for neonatal sepsis.Infants admitted to neonatal intensive care units for suspicion of bacterial sepsis receive at least two broad-spectrum antibiotics for a minimum of 48 to 72 hours to cover both gram-positive and gram-negative organisms while awaiting blood culture results. On average, bacterial growth becomes detectable within 12 to 24 hours, with an additional 24 to 48 hours required for identification. We have previously described using a 16S rRNA PCR assay for screening neonatal blood for bacterial DNA. Combining PCR with DNA sequencing could prove a faster means of detecting bacteria than culture-based identification. If successful, antibiotic therapy could be appropriately tailored sooner, thus sparing infants the administration of unnecessary antibiotics. Our goal was to assess the potential of pyrosequencing to differentiate between bacteria commonly associated with neonatal sepsis. To begin, full-length sequencing of the 380-bp 16S rRNA amplicons from representative bacteria was conducted (ABI 3100) and several databases queried. These included Staphylococcus sp., Streptococcus sp., Listeria sp., and numerous gram-negative rods. The sequences from clinical isolates were identical to those present in the published databases for the same bacteria. As a result, an informative 15 bases within the 380-bp amplicon was targeted for pyrosequencing following enrichment culture and PCR amplification. A total of 643 bacterial isolates commonly associated with neonatal sepsis, and 15 PCR-positive, culture-positive neonatal whole blood samples were analyzed by pyrosequencing. Results of DNA sequencing and culture identification were compared. In summary, we were successful at using PCR and pyrosequencing together to accurately differentiate between highly diverse bacterial groups.Utility of pyrosequencing in identifying bacteria directly from positive blood culture bottles.Growth in liquid media is the gold standard for detecting microorganisms associated with bloodstream infections. The Gram stain provides the first clue as to the etiology of infection, with phenotypic identification completed 1 or 2 days later. Providing more detailed information than the Gram stain can impart, and in less time than subculturing, would allow the use of more directed empirical therapy and, thus, reduce the patient's exposure to unnecessary or ineffective antibiotics sooner. The study had two objectives, as follows: (i) to identify new targets to improve our ability to differentiate among certain enteric gram-negative rods or among certain Streptococcus species and (ii) to determine whether real-time PCR and pyrosequencing could as accurately identify organisms directly from positive blood culture bottles as culture-based methods. Two hundred and fifty-five consecutive positive blood culture bottles were included. The results showed a high level of agreement between the two approaches; of the 270 bacteria isolated from the 255 blood culture bottles, results for pyrosequencing and culture-based identifications were concordant for 264/270 (97.8%) bacteria with three failed sequences, and three sequences without match. Additionally, compared to the universal 16S rRNA gene target, the new 23S rRNA gene targets greatly improved our ability to differentiate among certain enteric gram-negative rods or among certain Streptococcus species. In conclusion, combining real-time PCR and pyrosequencing provided valuable information beyond that derived from the initial Gram stain and in less time than phenotypic culture-based identification. This strategy, if implemented, could result in a more directed empirical therapy in patients and would promote responsible antibiotic stewardship.Rapid diagnosis of bacterial sepsis with PCR amplification and microarray hybridization in 16S rRNA gene.In this study, blood culture and PCR-microarray analysis were used to examine 172 cases of suspected septicemia. Primers and oligonucleotide probes, based on the sequences of bacterial 16SrRNA gene, were arrayed by imprinting on microarray slides. Blood specimens collected from 172 cases of suspected septicemia were cultured and then tested separately by PCR for the bacterial 16S rRNA. Of the 172 clinical cases, 17 cases tested positive by PCR. The number of positives identified by PCR (9.88%) was significantly higher than the number of positives identified by the blood culture (4.65%). When blood culture was used as control, the sensitivity of PCR was 100%, the specificity was 97.85%, and the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.979. When the 17 PCR positive specimens were further analyzed by hybridization against the microarrays, five were found to be probe positive for E. coli, four were positive for S. epidermidis, four were positive for CoNS, and two were positive for Bacillus and Propionibacterium, respectively. In the eight specimens showing positive results by both PCR and blood culture, the species determined by microarray analysis corresponded with the result obtained from blood culture. Detection of the bacterial 16SrRNA genes in clinical specimens by PCR and microarray analysis can be used to accurately diagnose neonatal sepsis. This method has a higher sensitivity and specificity than blood culture and can provide a rapid way for the etiological diagnosis of neonatal septicemia.Diagnosis of neonatal sepsis using universal primer polymerase chain reaction before and after starting antibiotic drug therapy.To study universal primer 16S rRNA gene polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for diagnosis of blood culture-positive neonatal sepsis before and after starting antibiotic drug therapy.Prospective study of diagnostic tests.Level III neonatal intensive care unit. Patients Neonates with a fresh episode of clinically suspected sepsis were enrolled; those with major malformations, life expectancy less than 12 hours, or contaminated blood cultures were excluded.Before starting antibiotic drug therapy, PCR (0 hour), blood culture, and sepsis screening (complete blood cell counts, micro-erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and C-reactive protein level) were performed. The PCR was repeated 12, 24, and 48 hours after starting antibiotic drug therapy.The primary outcomes were the sensitivity and specificity of 0-hour PCR for diagnosing blood culture-positive sepsis, and the secondary outcome was the proportion of 0-hour PCR-positive patients who remained positive after antibiotic drug therapy.Of 306 patients evaluated, 242 were included (mean [SD] gestation, 32.2 [3.1] weeks; and mean [SD] birth weight, 1529.2 [597.2] g). Blood culture was positive in 52 patients and 0-hour PCR in 57. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of PCR were 96.2%, 96.3%, 87.7%, 98.8%, 26.1, and 0.04, respectively. Two patients were blood culture positive but 0-hour PCR negative, whereas 7 were 0-hour PCR positive but blood culture negative. Of the 0-hour PCR-positive patients, 7 remained positive at 12 hours and none at 24 and 48 hours after starting antibiotic drug therapy. In 0-hour PCR-positive patients, no predictors of positive 12-hour PCR were identified.Universal primer PCR can accurately diagnose neonatal sepsis before but not after antibiotic drugs are given.Detection of fungal DNA in lysis-centrifugation blood culture for the diagnosis of invasive candidiasis in neonatal patients.We report data concerning the detection of fungal DNA directly from lysis-centrifugation blood culture to assess its value in the detection of fungaemia in 86 of the 347 patients admitted to the neonatal intensive-care unit between January 2009 and December 2010. The sensitivity and specificity of the PCR were 87.5% and 98.5%, respectively, with a positive predictive value of 93.3% and a negative predictive value of 97.1%. Detection of fungal DNA directly from blood culture Isolator 1.5 microbial tubes, without prior cultivation, is a promising approach for the rapid detection of Candida spp. in neonates with suspected candidaemia.Detection of bacterial DNA by PCR and reverse hybridization in the 16S rRNA gene with particular reference to neonatal septicemia.The clinical diagnosis of sepsis is difficult, particularly in neonates. It is necessary to develop a rapid and reliable method for detecting bacteria in blood and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and reverse hybridization of the 16S rRNA gene would permit fast and sensitive determination of the presence of bacteria and differentiate gram-positive bacteria from gram-negative ones in clinical specimens.We developed a pair of primers according to the gene encoding 16SrRNA found in all bacteria. DNA fragments from different bacterial species and from clinical samples were detected with PCR, and with reverse hybridization using a universal bacterial probe, a gram-positive probe and a gram-negative probe.A 371 bp DNA fragment was amplified from 20 different bacterial species. No signal was observed when human DNA and viruses were used as templates. The sensitivity could be improved to 10(-12) g. All 26 culture-positive clinical samples (22 blood samples and 4 CSF samples) were positive with PCR. The gram-negative and gram-positive probes hybridized to clinical samples and to known bacterial controls, as predicted by Gram's stain characteristics.Our results suggest that the method of PCR and reverse hybridization is rapid, sensitive and specific in detecting bacterial infections. This finding may be significant in the clinical diagnosis of sepsis in neonates.Rapid identification and differentiation of Gram-negative and Gram-positive bacterial bloodstream infections by quantitative polymerase chain reaction in preterm infants.To evaluate the usefulness of the Gram-specific probe-based quantitative polymerase chain reaction test for rapid detection and differentiation of Gram-negative and Gram-positive bacterial bloodstream infection in preterm infants.Cross-sectional study.University-affiliated Level III neonatal intensive care unit.Preterm infants with clinical features suggestive of late-onset infection.None.In addition to the full sepsis screen, 0.5 mL of EDTA blood was collected aseptically for Gram-specific quantitative polymerase chain reaction evaluation. The results were analyzed with respect to outcomes of bacterial culture in blood and other body fluids, including peritoneal and cerebrospinal fluids. The diagnostic utilities of the quantitative polymerase chain reaction were determined. A total of 218 suspected infection episodes were investigated, of which 42 episodes were culture positive and 176 were culture negative. For Gram-negative infection, the quantitative polymerase chain reaction test correctly identified 19 of 22 episodes, and the sensitivity and specificity were 86.4% and 99.0%, respectively. For Gram-positive infection, the test correctly identified 14/19 episodes, and the sensitivity and specificity were 73.7% and 98.5%. The remaining one episode was Candida albicans septicemia. None of the episodes with positive quantitative polymerase chain reaction test were classified into the wrong Gram stain category. More importantly, despite negative blood culture in five infants suffering from intra-abdominal sepsis (peritonitis [n = 4] and hepatosplenic abscess [n = 1]), the quantitative polymerase chain reaction test could detect the Gram-specific category of causative organisms in blood.The Gram-specific quantitative polymerase chain reaction test is reliable and highly specific for rapid identification and differentiation of Gram-negative and Gram-positive bloodstream and intra-abdominal infections. The result could be made available within 5 hrs after the specimen reaches the laboratory. A positive test is able to "rule in" bacterial bloodstream infection before blood culture results become available, and serves as a guide to predict the virulence of the causative organism according to its Gram-specific category so that critical patients can be targeted for intensive treatment.PCR-based diagnosis of neonatal staphylococcal bacteremias.We compared PCR with blood cultures in the diagnosis of neonatal staphylococcal sepsis. Significant association was observed between PCR-based and culture-based diagnosis of staphylococcal bacteremia. Positive and negative predictive values for PCR were 100% and 98%, respectively. These data indicate that PCR may serve as a useful adjunct for the rapid diagnosis of staphylococcal sepsis.A multiplex nested PCR for the detection and identification of Candida species in blood samples of critically ill paediatric patients.Nosocomial candidaemia is associated with high mortality rates in critically ill paediatric patients; thus, the early detection and identification of the infectious agent is crucial for successful medical intervention. The PCR-based techniques have significantly increased the detection of Candida species in bloodstream infections. In this study, a multiplex nested PCR approach was developed for candidaemia detection in neonatal and paediatric intensive care patients.DNA samples from the blood of 54 neonates and children hospitalised in intensive care units with suspected candidaemia were evaluated by multiplex nested PCR with specific primers designed to identify seven Candida species, and the results were compared with those obtained from blood cultures.The multiplex nested PCR had a detection limit of four Candida genomes/mL of blood for all Candida species. Blood cultures were positive in 14.8% of patients, whereas the multiplex nested PCR was positive in 24.0% of patients, including all culture-positive patients. The results obtained with the molecular technique were available within 24 hours, and the assay was able to identify Candida species with 100% of concordance with blood cultures. Additionally, the multiplex nested PCR detected dual candidaemia in three patients.Our proposed PCR method may represent an effective tool for the detection and identification of Candida species in the context of candidaemia diagnosis in children, showing highly sensitive detection and the ability to identify the major species involved in this infection.[Evaluation of the LightCycler® SeptiFast test in newborns and infants with clinical suspicion of sepsis].Neonatal sepsis is a significant cause of morbidity and mortality. Early diagnosis and prompt antimicrobial therapy are crucial for a favorable outcome of the newborn child. Blood culture, the current "gold standard" method for diagnosing bloodstream infections, has a low sensitivity in newborns. We evaluated the multiplex real-time PCR LightCycler(®) SeptiFast (LC-SF) for detection of bloodstream infections in newborns, compared with conventional blood culture.A total of 42 blood samples were obtained from 35 subjects presenting with a febrile episode and hospitalized in neonatal intensive care unit at Hospital Universitario Virgen de las Nieves. Two samples were collected during each febrile episode in order to carry out LC-SF assay and blood culture, respectively.Sensitivity and specificity of 79% and 87%, respectively, compared with clinical diagnosis, were obtained for LC-SF. Contamination rate of blood cultures was 16.7%, mainly due to coagulase-negative staphylococci (CoNS) and viridans groups of streptococci. Contamination rate of LC-SF by CoNS was 2.4%. Concordance between LC-SF and blood culture was moderate (kappa index: 0.369). LC-SF demonstrated a higher concordance (kappa index: 0.729) with the final clinical diagnosis than blood culture (kappa index: 0.238).LC-SF assay could be a useful diagnostic tool, along with a conventional blood culture, in newborn, for confirming or ruling out those cases that blood culture could not determine, shortening the time to result to 7 hours.Comparison of 16S rRNA gene PCR and BACTEC 9240 for detection of neonatal bacteremia.Ten percent of infants born in the United States are admitted to neonatal intensive care units (NICU) annually. Approximately one-half of these admissions are from term infants (>34 weeks of gestation) at risk for systemic infection. Most of the term infants are not infected but rather have symptoms consistent with other medical conditions that mimic sepsis. The current standard of care for evaluating bacterial sepsis in the newborn is performing blood culturing and providing antibiotic therapy while awaiting the 48-h preliminary result of culture. Implementing a more rapid means of ruling out sepsis in term newborns could result in shorter NICU stays and less antibiotic usage. The purpose of this feasibility study was to compare the utility of PCR to that of conventional culture. To this end, a total of 548 paired blood samples collected from infants admitted to the NICU for suspected sepsis were analyzed for bacterial growth using the BACTEC 9240 instrument and for the bacterial 16S rRNA gene using a PCR assay which included a 5-h preamplification culturing step. The positivity rates by culture and PCR were 25 (4.6%) and 27 (4.9%) positive specimens out of a total of 548 specimens, respectively. The comparison revealed sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 96.0, 99. 4, 88.9, and 99.8%, respectively, for PCR. In summary, this PCR-based approach, requiring as little as 9 h of turnaround time and blood volumes as small as 200 microl, correlated well with conventional blood culture results obtained for neonates suspected of having bacterial sepsis.Diagnostic accuracy of a 16S ribosomal DNA gene-based molecular technique (RT-PCR, microarray, and sequencing) for bacterial meningitis, early-onset neonatal sepsis, and spontaneous bacterial peritonitis.The diagnostic accuracy of a 16S ribosomal DNA (rDNA) gene-based molecular technique for bacterial meningitis (BM), early-onset neonatal sepsis (EONS), and spontaneous bacterial peritonitis (SBP) is evaluated. The molecular approach gave better results for BM diagnosis: sensitivity (S) was 90.6% compared to 78.1% for the bacterial culture. Percentages of cases correctly diagnosed (CCD) were 91.7% and 80.6%, respectively. For EONS diagnosis, S was 60.0% for the molecular approach and 70.0% for the bacterial culture; and CCD was 95.2% and 96.4%, respectively. For SPB diagnosis, the molecular approach gave notably poorer results than the bacterial cultures. S and CCD were 48.4% and 56.4% for the molecular approach and 80.6% and 89.1% for bacterial cultures. Nevertheless, bacterial DNA was detected in 53.3% of culture-negative samples. Accuracy of the 16S rDNA PCR approach differs depending on the sample, the microorganisms involved, the expected bacterial load, and the presence of bacterial DNA other than that from the pathogen implied in the infectious disease.Laboratory diagnosis of late-onset sepsis in newborns by multiplex real-time PCR.Evaluating the near-term infant for early onset sepsis: progress and challenges to consider with 16S rDNA polymerase chain reaction testing.Although the rate of early onset sepsis in the near-term neonate is low (one to eight of 1,000 cases), the rate of mortality and morbidity is high. As a result, infants receive multiple, broad-spectrum antibiotic therapy, many for up to 7 days despite blood cultures showing no growth. Maternal intrapartum antibiotic prophylaxis and small blood volume collections from infants are cited as reasons for the lack of confidence in negative culture results. Incorporating an additional, more rapid test could facilitate a more timely diagnosis in these infants. To this end, a 16S rDNA polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay was compared to blood culturing for use as a tool in evaluating early onset sepsis. Of 1,751 neonatal intensive care unit admissions that were screened, 1,233 near-term infants met inclusion criteria. Compared to culture, PCR demonstrated excellent analytical specificity (1,186 of 1,216, 97.5%) and negative predictive value (1,186 of 1,196, 99.2%); however, PCR failed to detect a significant number of culture-proven cases. These findings underscore the cautionary stance that should be taken at this time when considering the use of a molecular amplification test for diagnosing neonatal sepsis. The experience gained from this study illustrates the need for changes in sample collection and preparation techniques so as to improve analytical sensitivity of the assay.Molecular detection of late-onset neonatal sepsis in premature infants using small blood volumes: proof-of-concept.Conventional blood culture is still the gold standard for sepsis diagnosis but results are not immediately available and pathogens are only detected in approximately 25% of cases. New molecular assays for the detection of blood stream pathogens are promising diagnostic tools.The aim of the study was to adapt and evaluate a multiplex PCR system using 100 µl blood. -46 blood specimens of very low birth weight infants (818 ± 242 g) with suspected sepsis were analyzed using the Roche SeptiFast MGRADE PCR with a modified DNA extraction protocol and software handling tool for decreased blood volume requirements.In the non-infected group, 5/21 infants had a positive PCR result with coagulase-negative staphylococci. All pathogens detected in the blood culture positive group (n = 15) were also detected by PCR. In addition, 4/6 patients had a positive PCR result in the clinical sepsis group (clinical and laboratory signs of sepsis but negative blood culture). Overall, the PCR was demonstrated to have a higher sensitivity (90.5%; 95%CI 68.2-98.3%) in comparison to blood culture (71.4%; 95%CI 47.7-87.8%) including clinical sepsis cases, even though it had a lower specificity (80.0%; 95%CI 58.7-92.4% versus 100.0%; 95%CI 83.4-100.0%).These first data demonstrate the usability and potential benefit of this multiplex PCR using a modified DNA extraction for the rapid detection of nosocomial sepsis in preterm infants in addition to blood culture.The usefulness of the buffy coat smear and panbacterial polymerase chain reaction in early diagnosis of neonatal sepsis.In this study are evaluated the usefulness of the buffy coat smear and panbacterial polymerase chain reaction (PCR) as diagnostic tests in the early detection of neonatal sepsis.It was studied 49 patients aged up to 28 days who were hospitalized in the Intensive Care Unit (ICUs) of the Neonatology, with a clinical diagnosis of neonatal sepsis and 49 umbilical cord samples of healthy newborns. Blood cultures and 50 microL of plasma were taken for the DNA and performance of the broad-range PCR primer system (panbacterial PCR). Simultaneously, were taken three capillaries with blood for the leukocyte layer (buffy coat) smear, we performed three stains: Gram; Löeffler blue methylene (LBM), and acridine orange (AO). Statistical analysis included sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) against the clinical diagnosis.With respect to stains of buffy coat smear, they resulted very specific, from 90-97%, with 64-75% sensitivity, 87-94% PPV, and 77-82% NPV. In inverse fashion, PCR resulted very sensitive at 96%, with 91% specificity, 92% PPV, and 96% NPV.Buffy coat smear stains are easy, fast, and specific, while that of PCR was highly sensitive. Thus, both can be utilized as diagnostic tests.Diagnosis of neonatal sepsis by broad-range 16S real-time polymerase chain reaction.The standard diagnostic test (blood culture) for suspected neonatal sepsis has limitations in sensitivity and specificity, and 16S polymerase chain reaction (PCR) has been suggested as a new diagnostic tool for neonatal sepsis.To develop and evaluate a new real-time PCR method for detection of bacterial DNA in blood samples collected from infants with suspected neonatal sepsis.Immediately after blood culture, a study sample of 0.5-1.0 ml whole blood was collected and used for a novel 16S real-time PCR assay. All positive samples were sequenced. Detailed case studies were performed in all cases with conflicting results, to verify if PCR could detect pathogens in culture negative sepsis.368 samples from 317 infants were included. When compared with blood culture, the assay yielded a sensitivity of 79%, a specificity of 90%, a positive predictive value of 59%, and a negative predictive value of 96%. Seven of the 31 samples with a positive PCR result and a negative blood culture had definite or suspected bacterial sepsis. In five samples, PCR (but not blood culture) could detect a pathogen that was present in a blood culture collected more than 24 h prior to the PCR sample.This study presents an evaluation of a new real-time PCR technique that can detect culture-positive sepsis, and suggests that PCR has the potential to detect bacteria in culture-negative samples even after the initiation of intravenous antibiotics.Multiplex PCR allows rapid and accurate diagnosis of bloodstream infections in newborns and children with suspected sepsis.Sepsis is a major health problem in newborns and children. Early detection of pathogens allows initiation of appropriate antimicrobial therapy that strongly correlates with positive outcomes. Multiplex PCR has the potential to rapidly identify bloodstream infections, compensating for the loss of blood culture sensitivity. In an Italian pediatric hospital, multiplex PCR (the LightCycler SeptiFast test) was compared to routine blood culture with 1,673 samples obtained from 803 children with suspected sepsis; clinical and laboratory information was used to determine the patient infection status. Excluding results attributable to contaminants, SeptiFast showed a sensitivity of 85.0% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 78.7 to 89.7%) and a specificity of 93.5% (95% CI = 92.1 to 94.7%) compared to blood culture. The rate of positive results was significantly higher with SeptiFast (14.6%) than blood culture (10.3%) (P < 0.0001), and the overall positivity rate was 16.1% when the results of both tests were combined. Staphylococcus aureus (11.6%), coagulase-negative staphylococci (CoNS) (29.6%), Pseudomonas aeruginosa (16.5%), and Klebsiella spp. (10.1%) were the most frequently detected. SeptiFast identified 97 additional isolates that blood culture failed to detect (24.7% P. aeruginosa, 23.7% CoNS, 14.4% Klebsiella spp., 14.4% Candida spp.). Among specimens taken from patients receiving antibiotic therapy, we also observed a significantly higher rate of positivity of SeptiFast than blood culture (14.1% versus 6.5%, respectively; P < 0.0001). On the contrary, contaminants were significantly more frequent among blood cultures than SeptiFast (n = 97 [5.8%] versus n = 26 [1.6%]), respectively; P < 0.0001). SeptiFast served as a highly valuable adjunct to conventional blood culture in children, adding diagnostic value and shortening the time to result (TTR) to 6 h.Evaluation of a real-time fluorescent PCR assay for rapid detection of Group B Streptococci in neonatal blood.Streptococcus agalactiae (Group B Streptococcus: GBS) is the major causative agent of neonatal sepsis. Neonates at risk for GBS infections are empirically administered broad-spectrum antibiotics for at least 48 h pending blood culture results. A rapid assay to expedite detection of GBS would facilitate initiation of specific antibiotic therapy. Conversely, expeditious proof of absence of infection will avoid unnecessary antibiotic use. Using the LightCycler, we evaluated a hybridization probe polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay to detect GBS-specific cfb gene target DNA sequence in blood specimens. Both sensitivity and specificity of the real-time PCR assay was 100%. The assay demonstrated 100% specificity when tested against 26 non-GBS bacteria. This method is capable of detecting as few as approximately 100 copies or 10 pg of GBS genomic DNA. This real-time PCR method is rapid, sensitive, and specific for the detection of GBS in neonatal blood samples and holds great promise in its utility in the diagnostic laboratory.Values of C-reactive protein, procalcitonin, and Staphylococcus-specific PCR in neonatal late-onset sepsis.To evaluate the predictive value of relevant clinical and laboratory parameters (complete blood count (CBC), C-reactive protein (CRP), procalcitonin (PCT) and Staphylococcus-specific polymerase chain reaction (PCR)) in neonates with suspected late-onset sepsis (LOS).NICU neonates were prospectively followed for septic events. One hundred and eleven neonates developed 148 suspected septic events beyond 3 d of age. We recorded the clinical signs and laboratory abnormalities at onset of sepsis, serum CRP and PCT, Staphylococcus-specific PCR, microbiological data, and empiric antimicrobial therapy.Variables significantly associated with subsequently confirmed LOS included hypotension (relative risk (RR) = 5.6, 95% CI 3.29-9.53), mechanical ventilation (RR = 2.46, 95% CI 1.24-4.86), immature/total neutrophil ratio (I/T) > 0.2 (RR = 5.13, 95% CI 2.54-10.31), CRP > 1.0 mg/dl (RR = 2.85, 95% CI 1.32-6.15), and small-for-gestational-age (SGA) status (RR = 2.13, 95% CI 1.03-4.38). PCT was not significantly associated with LOS. For detection of staphylococcal bacteremia, Staphylococcus-specific PCR showed: sensitivity 57.1%, specificity 94.7%, positive predictive value 53.3%, and negative predictive value 95.4%.Hypotension, mechanical ventilation, I/T > 0.2, CRP > 1.0 mg/dl, and SGA status at onset of sepsis are significant predictors of proven neonatal LOS. Staphylococcus-specific PCR might be of value in ruling out staphylococcal sepsis.Rapid diagnosis of sepsis and bacterial meningitis in children with real-time fluorescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction amplification in the bacterial 16S rRNA gene.A method for the detection of bacterial pathogens in sepsis and bacterial meningitis with 16S rRNA gene- based real-time fluorescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction (FQ-PCR) is developed. A total of 190 blood specimens and 5 cerebrospinal fluid specimens from neonates with suspected sepsis or bacterial meningitis were evaluated with 16S rRNA gene-based real-time FQ-PCR assay. The positive rate of the real-time FQ-PCR assay was significantly higher (25/195, 12.82%) than that of bacterial culture (15/195, 7.69%; P = .002). When bacterial culture was used as a control, the sensitivity of the real-time FQ-PCR was 100%, the specificity was 94.4%, and Youden's index was 0.944. This study suggests that 16S rRNA gene-based real-time FQ-PCR assay is an important and accurate method in the detection of bacterial pathogens of sepsis and bacterial meningitis and should have a promising usage in the diagnosis of sepsis and bacterial meningitis.Gram stain-specific-probe-based real-time PCR for diagnosis and discrimination of bacterial neonatal sepsis.Sepsis is a serious disease with high mortality in newborns. It is very important to have a convenient and accurate method for pathogenic diagnosis of neonatal sepsis. We developed a method of simultaneous detection and Gram classification of clinically relevant bacterial pathogens causing sepsis directly from blood samples with Gram stain-specific-probe-based real-time PCR (GSPBRT-PCR). With GSPBRT-PCR, 53 clinically important strains representing 25 gram-positive and 28 gram-negative bacterial species were identified correctly with the corresponding Gram probe. The limits of the GSPBRT-PCR assay in serial dilutions of the bacteria revealed that Staphylococcus aureus could be detected at concentrations of 3 CFU per PCR and Escherichia coli at concentrations as low as 1 CFU per PCR. The GSPBRT-PCR assay was further evaluated on 600 blood specimens from patients with suspicion of neonatal sepsis and compared to the results obtained from blood cultures. The positive rate of the GSPBRT-PCR array was 50/600 (8.33%), significantly higher than that of blood culture (34/600; 5.67%) (P = 0.00003). When blood culture was used as a control, the sensitivity of GSPBRT-PCR was 100%, the specificity was 97.17%, and the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.972. This study suggests that GSPBRT-PCR is very useful for the rapid and accurate diagnosis of bacterial infection and that it can have an important impact on the current inappropriate and unnecessary use of antibiotics in the treatment of newborns.Real-time PCR of the 16S-rRNA gene in the diagnosis of neonatal bacteraemia.To evaluate a real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of neonatal bacteraemia.Two hundred ninety-five plasma samples from 288 newborns with suspected neonatal sepsis were collected prospectively for the purpose of polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based bacterial detection. A real-time PCR targeting the bacterial gene for 16S-rRNA gene combined with four specific probes designed to detect Gram-negative bacteria, Staphylococcus aureus and coagulase-negative staphylococci (CoNS) was developed. All samples positive in the universal PCR were further sequenced for bacterial identification.When applied to a material from 50 patients with positive blood culture and 245 patients with negative blood culture, the universal PCR showed a sensitivity of 42% (28-57), a specificity of 95% (92-97), a positive predictive value of 64% (45-80), and a negative predictive value of 89% (84-92) (95% confidence intervals in brackets).A new real-time PCR technique was for the first time applied to a well-defined prospectively and consecutively enrolled material of newborns with suspected sepsis, combining the benefits of real-time PCR with specific probes and sequencing. The method managed to detect bacteraemia with high specificity even though the sensitivity was low. Factors causing the low sensitivity are identified and further strategies to develop the method are described.Comparison of 16S rRNA gene PCR and blood culture for diagnosis of neonatal sepsis.Septicemia is a common cause of morbidity and mortality among newborns in the developing world. However, accurate clinical diagnosis of neonatal sepsis is often difficult because symptoms and signs are often nonspecific. Blood culture has been the gold standard for confirmation of the diagnosis. However, the sensitivity is low and results are usually not promptly obtained. Therefore, the diagnosis of sepsis is often based on clinical signs in association with laboratory tests such as platelets count, immature/total neutrophils ratio (I/T), and a rise in C-reactive protein (CRP). Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) methods for the detection of neonatal sepsis represent new diagnostic tools for the early identification of pathogens.During a 4-month prospective study, 16S rRNA PCR was compared with conventional blood culture for the diagnosis of neonatal bacterial sepsis. In addition, the relationship between known risk factors, clinical signs, laboratory parameters, and the diagnosis of sepsis was considered.Sepsis was suspected in 706 infants from the intensive neonatal care unit. They all were included in the study. The number of positive cultures and positive PCR results were 95 (13.5%) and 123 (17.4%), respectively. Compared with blood culture, the diagnosis of bacterial sepsis by PCR revealed a 100.0% sensitivity, 95.4% specificity, 77.2% positive predictive value, and 100.0% negative predictive value. In this study, Apgar scores at 5 min, weight, icterus, irritability, feeding difficulties, gestational age (GA), premature rupture of membrane (PRM), platelets count, I/T, and a marked rise in CRP were important in establishing the diagnosis of sepsis in the newborn. In addition, weight, GA, PRM, irritability, duration of antibiotic usage, mortality rate, and number of purulent meningitis cases were significantly different between early-onset sepsis and late-onset sepsis.16S rRNA PCR increased the sensitivity in detecting bacterial DNA in newborns with signs of sepsis, allowed a rapid detection of the pathogens, and led to shorter antibiotic courses. However, uncertainty about the bacterial cause of sepsis was not reduced by this method. 16S rRNA PCR needs to be further developed and improved. Blood culture is currently irreplaceable, since pure isolates are essential for antimicrobial drug susceptibility testing.Real-time polymerase chain reaction for detecting bacterial DNA directly from blood of neonates being evaluated for sepsis.Speed is of the essence when evaluating an infant with symptoms consistent with sepsis. Because of the high morbidity and mortality associated with neonatal sepsis, infants receive multiple, broad-spectrum antibiotics before receiving finalized blood culture results. Incorporating an additional, reliable, yet rapid assay to detect bacteria directly from blood would facilitate timely diagnosis and appropriate care. To this end, we designed a real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay targeting the highly conserved 380 bases of 16S rDNA. DNA was extracted from whole-blood samples using a Qiagen column. The limit of detection for the TaqMan-based assay, using a Smartcycler instrument, was 40, 50, or 2000 colony-forming units per milliliter of blood (CFU/ml) of Escherichia coli, group B Streptococcus, and Listeria monocytogenes, respectively, when white blood cell counts were below 39,000/microl. Implementing this approach requires less than 4 hours for both sample preparation and real-time PCR compared with 1 to 2 days to detect growth in culture or 5 days to finalize no-growth culture results. There was an overall agreement between the results of culture and real-time PCR of 94.1% (80 of 85) in this study. These results suggest that molecular techniques can augment culture-based methods for diagnosing neonatal sepsis, especially in infants whose mothers have received intrapartum antibiotic prophylaxis.A novel diagnostic tool for detecting neonatal infections using multiplex polymerase chain reaction.In newborns with infections, it is necessary to detect various pathogens rapidly and accurately, because the infections are often fatal when diagnosis is delayed. However, no diagnostic tools that rapidly detect pathogens causing neonatal infectious diseases are available.To establish a rapid diagnostic tool using multiplex polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to detect 8 major pathogens that often cause neonatal infections, including Group B Streptococcus, Escherichia coli, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus, Ureaplasma urealyticum, herpes simplex virus, Cytomegalovirus, and Candida albicans, and to validate this tool in the neonatal intensive care unit (NICU).One hundred and thirty clinical samples were obtained from newborns with any infectious signs or histories. DNA was extracted from these samples and multiplex PCR was performed with a mixture of 8 primer pairs, all designed to amplify pathogenic DNA and produce different sizes of amplicons. Seventy-seven samples with suspicion of bacterial infections were also examined by bacterial culture to evaluate the accuracy of the multiplex PCR results.Six of the 8 pathogens could be rapidly detected by our multiplex PCR method, within 3.5-4.5 h. These positive results led us to immediately diagnose and select proper drugs against each pathogen. In comparison with culture results, our test characteristics were as follows: specificity: 93%, negative predictive value: 96%, and concordance rate: 90%.We have established and validated a rapid diagnostic tool for detecting pathogens using multiplex PCR, which may be useful for the confirmed diagnosis of neonatal infections in the NICU.Detection of fungemia by polymerase chain reaction in critically ill neonates and children.To compare polymerase chain reaction (PCR) with blood culture for the detection of fungemia in neonatal and pediatric intensive care unit patients.A total of 0.2 to 0.5 ml of blood was collected simultaneously with blood culture in patients with suspected sepsis. Following DNA extraction, the gene for fungal 18S rRNA was amplified and PCR products analyzed by agarose gel electrophoresis.Of 70 patient samples, nine of nine with a positive blood culture for Candida were PCR positive, and one of four with a positive blood culture for Malassezia was PCR positive. In total, 13 of 57 samples with negative blood culture for fungus were PCR positive. Seven of these 13 patients had other evidence of invasive fungal disease. In contrast, none of the 44 blood culture-negative/PCR-negative patients had other evidence of fungal infection.PCR may be a useful adjunct to blood culture for the rapid detection of fungemia in high-risk patients.Development of a multiplex real-time PCR assay for the rapid diagnosis of neonatal late onset sepsis.The diagnosis of late onset sepsis (LOS), a severe condition with high prevalence in preterm infants, is hampered by the suboptimal sensitivity and long turnaround time of blood culture. Detection of the infecting pathogen directly in blood by PCR would provide a much more timely result. Unfortunately, PCR-based assays reported so far are labor intensive and often lack direct species identification. Therefore we developed a real-time multiplex PCR assay tailored to LOS diagnosis which is easy-to-use, is applicable on small blood volumes and provides species-specific results within 4h. Species-specific PCR assays were selected from literature or developed using bioinformatic tools for the detection of the most prevalent etiologic pathogens: Enterococcus faecalis, Staphylococcus aureus, Staphylococcus spp., Streptococcus agalactiae, Escherichia coli, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Klebsiella spp. and Serratia marcescens. The PCR assays showed 100% specificity, full coverage of the target pathogens and a limit of detection (LOD) of ≤10CFUeq./reaction. These LOD values were maintained in the multiplex format or when bacterial DNA was isolated from blood. Clinical evaluation showed high concordance between the multiplex PCR and blood culture. In conclusion, we developed a multiplex PCR that allows the direct detection of the most important bacterial pathogens causing LOS in preterm infants. Rapid detection of neonatal sepsis using polymerase chain reaction.Clinical diagnosis of sepsis in newborn infants is not easy and there is no laboratory test with 100% specificity and sensitivity, with the exception of blood culture, the results of which are not available for at least 48-72 h. Polymerase chain reaction methodology has been used to diagnose different bacterial, viral and protozoal infections, and the possibility of amplifying the DNA region common to all bacteria could represent an optimal method for the diagnosis of sepsis. The authors have performed PCR in a group of 33 neonates at risk for early-onset sepsis, correlating molecular data with blood culture results. The presence of bacterial DNA in blood samples was evaluated, amplifying the DNA region encoding the 16S rRNA. There were no false negative results (four positive blood cultures and four positive PCR), with competitive costs and time. This method also allows the diagnosis of sepsis due to uncommon species and also, using a second PCR with specific primers, an aetiological diagnosis.Comparison of broad range 16S rDNA PCR and conventional blood culture for diagnosis of sepsis in the newborn: a case control study.Early onset bacterial sepsis is a feared complication of the newborn. A large proportion of infants admitted to the Neonatal Intensive Care Unit (NICU) for suspected sepsis receive treatment with potent systemic antibiotics while a diagnostic workup is in progress. The gold standard for detecting bacterial sepsis is blood culture. However, as pathogens in blood cultures are only detected in approximately 25% of patients, the sensitivity of blood culture is suspected to be low. Therefore, the diagnosis of sepsis is often based on the development of clinical signs, in combination with laboratory tests such as a rise in C-reactive protein (CRP). Molecular assays for the detection of bacterial DNA in the blood represent possible new diagnostic tools for early identification of a bacterial cause.A broad range 16S rDNA polymerase chain reaction (PCR) without preincubation was compared to conventional diagnostic work up for clinical sepsis, including BACTEC blood culture, for early determination of bacterial sepsis in the newborn. In addition, the relationship between known risk factors, clinical signs, and laboratory parameters considered in clinical sepsis in the newborn were explored.Forty-eight infants with suspected sepsis were included in this study. Thirty-one patients were diagnosed with sepsis, only 6 of these had a positive blood culture. 16S rDNA PCR analysis of blinded blood samples from the 48 infants revealed 10 samples positive for the presence of bacterial DNA. PCR failed to be positive in 2 samples from blood culture positive infants, and was positive in 1 sample where a diagnosis of a non-septic condition was established. Compared to blood culture the diagnosis of bacterial proven sepsis by PCR revealed a 66.7% sensitivity, 87.5% specificity, 95.4% positive and 75% negative predictive value. PCR combined with blood culture revealed bacteria in 35.1% of the patients diagnosed with sepsis. Irritability and feeding difficulties were the clinical signs most often observed in sepsis. CRP increased in the presence of bacterial infection.There is a need for PCR as a method to quickly point out the infants with sepsis. However, uncertainty about a bacterial cause of sepsis was not reduced by the PCR result, reflecting that methodological improvements are required in order for DNA detection to replace or supplement traditional blood culture in diagnosis of bacterial sepsis.[A broad-range 16S rRNA gene real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of neonatal septicemia].To evaluate the usefulness of a broad-range real-time PCR assay aimed at the 16S rRNA gene of bacteria in a clinical setting in rapid and reliable diagnosis of neonatal septicemia for improving the speed and accuracy of bacterial detection.The universal primer and TaqMan probe were designed based on the highly conserved sequences of the bacterial 16S rRNA gene. The chosen primers and probe did not show any likely cross hybridization with human, viral or fungal genome sequences. The TaqMan assay used the fluorescent signal on the probe, such as 6-carboxyfluorescin (6-FAM), and quenched by the standard 6-carboxytetramethylrhodamine (TAMRA) probes. The broad-range 16S rRNA gene real-time PCR array was established. Then, three common pathogenic microorganisms including Staphylococcus aureus, Staphylococcus epidermidis and Escherichia coli, which were prepared by a 10-fold dilution series respectively from 10(8) colony forming unit (CFU)/ml to 10(3) CFU/ml, as well as controls, were used for testing of both sensitivity and specificity of the real-time PCR assay. The blood samples from 830 cases of suspected septicemia, who were hospitalized in our neonatal ward and the neonatal intensive care unit (NICU) and developed clinical signs suggestive of infection, were tested with routine culture and bacterial 16S rRNA genes real-time PCR separately. In addition, 30 neonates without infection were enrolled as the negative control group.All the three common pathogenic bacterial species were positive on the 16S rRNA genes real-time PCR assay. There were no cross-reaction with cytomegalovirus (CMV), Epstein-Barr virus (EBV), hepatitis B virus (HBV), fungi, human DNA and blank control, and the technique showed high specificity and sensitivity. The detection limit of the TaqMan assay was tested by amplifying serial dilutions of the three common pathogenic bacterial DNA. The minimal detection limit of the TaqMan system was equivalent to 3 CFU of bacteria, the threshold cycle (CT), which is inversely proportional to the log of the amount of target DNA initially present, was 37.90 by calculation. The real-time PCR assay was evaluated on 830 blood specimens for suspected neonatal septicemia, as compared to the results obtained from the routine bacterial cultures. The positive rate by the real-time PCR assay was 5.18% (43/830) in 830 samples, and was significantly higher than that of blood culture [2.41% (20/830) (P < 0.01)]. The real-time PCR was positive in all the 20 positive blood culture samples. Thirty non-infectious blood samples were negative by both the PCR assay and blood cultures. When blood culture was used as control, the sensitivity of the real-time PCR assay was 100%, the specificity was 97.16%, and the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.972. Moreover, three of the PCR positive amplicons were confirmed by sequencing to confirm the accuracy of the real-time PCR assay in testing clinical specimens. The sequencing showed that except for one sequence, all the others were demonstrated to be Staphylococcus aureus and Escherichia coli respectively, which was in accord with the results of the blood cultures.The bacterial 16S rRNA genes real-time PCR had been established to diagnose the neonatal septicemia. The sensitivity and specificity the real-time PCR assay were higher than those of blood culture. This technique can provide a rapid way for the etiological diagnosis of neonatal septicemia, and was a convenient and accurate method in etiologic diagnosis of neonatal septicemia.[Rapid diagnosis of neonatal sepsis by 16SrRNA genes PCR amplification and genechip hybridization].To explore a method for rapid diagnosis of sepsis in newborn infants.(1) The primers and oligonucleotide probes were designed and synthesized based on the sequences of bacterial 16SrRNA gene. The gene chip was prepared through the probes printed onto special glass slides. The gene chip included 18 special probes: universal probe 1, universal probe 2, Gram positive bacterial probe, Gram negative bacterial probe 1, Gram negative bacterial probe 2, Staphylococcus aureus, coagulase negative staphylococcus (CoNS) 1, CoNS 2, Escherichia coli, Hemophilus influenzae, Listeria monocytogenes, Streptococcus pneumoniae, Streptococcus agalactiae, Bacteroides fragilis, Bacillus, Meningococcus, Corynebacterium, Propionibacterium; (2) Blood specimens from 285 cases of suspected septicemia were cultured and bacterial 16S rRNA gene was detected separately; DNA isolated from blood specimens and cerebrospinal fluid was amplified by PCR, and PCR products were hybridized with the probes on the gene chips. Hybridization results were scanned and read by laser-scanner.(1) Of the 285 cases, 17 were positive by PCR and the positive rate (5.96%) was significantly higher than that of blood culture (2.81%) (P < 0.01). When blood culture was taken as control, the sensitivity of PCR was 100% and Specificity was 96.75%, the index of accurate diagnosis was 0.968. (2) The 17 specimens which showed positive results by PCR were further hybridized on the gene chip. All were positive by universal probes. Among all of them, 5 were positive by E. coli probe; 4 were positive by Staphylococcus epidermidis; two were positive by Bacillus and Propionibacterium probes, separately; 4 were positive by CoNS. The 8 specimens which showed positive results by both PCR and blood culture, the result of gene chip hybridization coincided with the result of blood culture.Detection of the bacterial 16SrRNA genes in clinical specimens by gene chip hybridization technology can diagnose neonatal septicemia rapidly. This method has higher sensitivity and specificity than blood culture or other methods and can provide a rapid way for the etiological diagnosis of neonatal septicemia. Therefore the genechip method may be valuable and practical in early diagnosis of neonatal septicemia.[Rapid diagnosis of common pathogenic bacteria infection in newborn infants by 16SrDNA oligonucleotide array].The rapid identification of pathogenic bacteria is important for earlier effective patient management and antimicrobial therapy, especially for the infant patient, whose immunological system is not fully developed. However conventional microbiogical techniques of bacterial identification, culture and isolation of pathogenic bacteria, identification by biochemistry and serological assay, are time-consuming and require intensive labor. On the basis of special gene sequence, PCR provides simple and rapid way to identify bacteria. But it is difficult to identify all of bacteria species which are suspicious of pathogenic agents. Oligonucleotide arrays provide a powerful tool for parallel detection of target genes. The objective of this study was to test a reverse oligonucleotide assay, which hybridize with the PCR product of 16SrDNA using a pair of universal primers, to rapidly identify common infant pathogenic bacteria.By comparison and analysis of the 16SrDNA sequences of common pathogenic bacteria, a region, which has numerous sequence variations and flanked by highly conserved sequences, was found. A pair of universal primers was designed according to its flanking conservative sequence, and a set of probes specially targeting to eight species of infant pathogenic bacteria, including staphylococcus aureus, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Klebsiella pneumoniae, Streptococcus faecalis, Hemophilus influenzae, Enterobacter cloacae, Escherichia coli, and Acinetobacter baumannii,according to the variable sequences. The probes were fixed on the nylon membrane with positive electricity, and hybridized them with the products of PCR using the universal primers.The universal primers could amplify the target sequence from bacteria including the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria and Staphylococcus epidermidis, Enterobacter aerogenes, Streptococcus pneumoniae,beta-hemolytic streptococcus, Neisseria meningitides, Citrobacter freundii, Bacillus subtilis, and Salmonella infantis,but could not amplify rotavirus and human DNA as control. The results showed that the oligonucleotide array could specially hybridize with the eight bacteria to be examined and could not hybridize with other bacteria. The lowest concentration of DNA (product of PCR) for oligonucleotide array was about 25 ng/ml. The results proved that the probes are highly selective and the oligonucleotide arrays could parallelly detect the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria. The results suggested that the oligonucleotide array system was able to identify the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria from clinical specimens and the results were the same as identified by automated bacterial detection machine. From the further experiments, the oligonucleotide array system could directly diagnose the common infant pathogenic bacteria from the broths of samples culture.Despite limited number of identifiable bacteria and lack of information on antibiotic susceptibility of bacteria, the reverse oligonucleotide assay system, which contains amplification of the segment of 16rDNA from samples using the universal primers and parallel detection of PCR products using specific probes, is an effective method to rapidly identify the eight common infant pathogenic bacteria.